 


Richard Rappaport | Professional Profile
 


























 









LinkedIn



















































Main content starts below.




Richard RappaportCEO & Founder @ WestPark Capital | Investment Banker | Emerging Growth & Middle Markets | IPO’s & Private PlacementsLocationLos Angeles, CaliforniaIndustryInvestment BankingCurrentWestPark Capital, Inc.PreviousGlobal Capital Securities, Joseph Charles & Associates, HJ Meyers & Co (Beverly Hills)EducationUniversity of California, Los AngelesWebsitesCompany BioCompany Website294 connectionsView Richard’s full profile. It's free!Your colleagues, classmates, and 500 million other professionals are on LinkedIn.View Richard’s Full ProfileSummaryRichard Rappaport is Chief Executive Officer and Founder of WestPark Capital – a full-service international investment bank that specializes in taking companies public. Focusing in a myriad of sectors, such as healthcare, software, technology, biotechnology, financial services, manufacturing, consumer products, media and telecom industries, WestPark Capital is located in the United States, China, Hong Kong and Taiwan. RIck is also the former chairman of New Roads School & a current board member at Skechers U.S.A., Inc.With extensive experience in the small capital investment banking and securities markets, Richard has led investment departments, been responsible for public offerings, and managed corporate finance activities for over three decades. His background consists of leadership and Managing Director roles in a number of investment firms, including the likes of Global Capital Securities and Joseph Charles & Associates. A key career achievement for Richard and the WestPark Capital firm has been the invention of the Structured IPO process. SIPO is a process through which a company recapitalizes and lists directly on an exchange by raising capital in various stages throughout the process.The SIPO consists of a Private Placement followed by an IPO, encompassing the cost effectiveness and timeliness of a Private Placement while also retaining the increased market awareness and liquidity of a Public Offering.Richard holds an MBA from University of California Los Angeles and a degree in Business Administration from University of California Berkeley. A recipient of the Wittenberg-Livingston Fellowship, Richard is also a member of the esteemed Beta Gamma Sigma Business Honorary Society.Specialties: With over 35 years of experience in the investment banking sector, Richard’s specialties lie in the areas of:•	Investment Banking•	Structured IPO•	Middle Market Companies•	Emerging Growth CompaniesExperienceCEOWestPark Capital, Inc.1999  –  Present (18 years)Richard is CEO and Founder of WestPark Capital – an investment bank specializing in emerging growth sectors and focusing in the fields of healthcare, software, technology, biotechnology, financial services, manufacturing, consumer products, media, telecom industries, and more. Using the revolutionary “SIPO” process, which Richard and the firm created, WestPark Capital has taken hundreds of companies public. As CEO, Richard manages the daily operations of WestPark, including administration, direction and coordination of the firm. In this role, Richard provides strategic leadership; development of WestPark’s vision and mission; implementation of policies; strategic thinking; oversight of the financial management and effective use of financial resources; people management; maintaining effective relationships with clients, partners and employees; supervising senior staff members; adhering to policies and procedures; and, complying with government regulations.Managing Director, Investment BankingGlobal Capital Securities1997  –  1999 (2 years)Prior to establishing WestPark Capital, Richard was Manager Director of Investment Banking at Global Capital Securities – an investment banking and securities brokerage firm. In this role, Richard headed the North American Investment Banking departments and was responsible for all aspects of the firm’s corporate finance activities.  As Managing Director, Richard managed existing clients and current deals, including closing deals. He was also responsible for developing new business for the firm, marketing services to clients, and establishing sales and marketing strategies.Managing Director, Investment BankingJoseph Charles & Associates1994  –  1997 (3 years)Richard was Managing Director of Investment Banking at Joseph Charles & Associates for four years. During this time, Richard managed the firm’s finances and led the investment banking department. Managing DirectorHJ Meyers & Co (Beverly Hills)1987  –  1995 (8 years)Richard’s role involved new business development and managing of the firm’s public offerings.  While in this position, Richard completed more than 25 public offerings and numerous private transactions.CertificationsGeneral Securities Representative (GS) LicenseFinancial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA), License Securities License - Series 7Limited Representative - Investment BankerFinancial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA), License Securities Licence - Series 79General Securities PrincipalFinancial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA), License Securities Licence - Series 24Uniform Securities Agent LicenseFinancial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA), License Securities Licence - Series 63Limited Representative  – Equity TraderFinancial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA), License Securities License - Series 55EducationUniversity of California, Los AngelesMaster of Business Administration (M.B.A.)Master of Business Administration (M.B.A.)1986  –  1988Richard completed a Master of Business Administration at the University of California Los Angeles (UCLA). With over 5,000 courses on offer, the University received a 2014 ranking of 10th in the Times Higher Education World Reputation Rankings and a 2014/2015 ranking of 12th in The World University Rankings by The Times of London.  Additional rankings for UCLA have included 12th in the Academic Ranking of World Universities (Shanghai Jiao Tong University), 23rd in the 2015 U.S. News & World Report and 5th in the Washington Monthly.University of California, BerkeleyBachelor’s Degree, ScienceBachelor’s Degree, Science1977  –  1981Richard holds a Bachelor Science, majoring in Business Administration, from the University of California Berkeley. Receiving a 2015 ranking of number one in the U.S. News & World Report rankings of public national universities – a ranking UC Berkeley has received for the last 17 years – the faculty at Berkeley is made up of seven Nobel prize winners, four Pulitzer Prize winners and three Fields Medal winners. Georgetown UniversityPolitical & Economic SystemsPolitical & Economic Systems1979ProjectsStructured IPO "SIPO"A Structured IPO (“SIPO”) is a process devised by WestPark Capital, Inc. through which a company recapitalizes and lists directly on an exchange in the U.S, Asia, or Europe (such as NasdaqGM, Hong Kong, TSX, LSE, etc.), by raising capital in various stages throughout the process. The SIPO consists of a Private Placement followed by an IPO, encompassing the cost effectiveness and timeliness of a Private Placement while also retaining the increased market awareness and liquidity of a Public Offering.Team members: Richard RappaportHonors & AwardsWittenberg-Livingston FellowshipWittenberg-Livingston Inc.1988Richard received the Wittenberg-Livingston Fellowship during his studies while at the University of California. The fellowship was granted by Wittenberg-Livingston Inc. – a building and development firm in California. Wittenberg-Livingston Inc. began providing scholarships in 1967 to outstanding students in the business faculty.Beta Gamma Sigma Businness Honorary SocietyAACSB International - The Association to Advance Collegiate Schools of Business1981Richard became a member of the Beta Gamma Sigma Business Honorary Society while studying at the University of California. Membership in Beta Gamma Sigma is the highest recognition a business student anywhere in the world can receive in a business program and is accredited by AACSB international.SkillsInvestment BankingStructured IPOSecuritiesIPOCorporate FinanceVenture CapitalStrategyPrivate EquityFinancial ModelingBusiness StrategyInvestmentsJoint VenturesDue DiligenceRisk ManagementEquitiesSee 14+Emerging MarketsProject FinanceValue Chain AnalysisFinancial MarketsEntrepreneurshipStart-upsLeadershipGlobal Business DevelopmentLead GenerationThought LeadershipStrategic PartnershipsBusiness NetworkingNetworkingSales AnalysisSee lessHow's this translation?Great•Has errorsThanks for your help!Volunteer Experience & CausesCauses Richard cares about:ChildrenEconomic EmpowermentEducationEnvironmentHealthDisaster and Humanitarian ReliefPoliticsSocial ServicesView Richard’s full profile to...See who you know in commonGet introducedContact Richard directlyView Richard’s Full ProfileNot the Richard you’re looking for? View moreView this profile in another languageEnglishGermanChinese (Simplified)People Also ViewedDawson FanPresident at Victory International GroupJohn ReillyManaging Director, WestPark Capital | 35 yr+ I-Banker & Securities | Middle Mkt | Tech, Energy, Life-Sciences/HealthcareSean MollardDirector of Syndicate at WestPark Capital, Inc.Reid ChristianVenture Investor at CRVRachael FooGrowth Stage Technology & Consumer InvestorRandy FieldsManaging Director
Investment Banking at WestPark CapitalPaul LouieJason SternChief Operating Officer, WestPark Capital | 25 yrs+ Financial Services, Broker-Dealer Ops & Sales, Licensed 7, 24, 63Tara SharifActing CEO at TarachonPublic profile badgeInclude this LinkedIn profile on other websitesView profile badgesFind a different Richard RappaportFirst NameLast NameExample:  Richard RappaportRichard RappaportUnited StatesRichard Rappaport,M.D.Associate Clinical Professor of Psychiatry at UC San DiegoUnited StatesRichard RappaportSales Manager at Custom Specialty PromotionsUnited StatesRichard RappaportCorporate Account Executive at Allstate Corporate Services Corp.United StatesRichard RappaportManaging Attorney at Richard V. Rappaport and AssociatesUnited StatesMore professionals named Richard RappaportLinkedIn member directory:abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzmoreBrowse members by country






















Rappaport, Richard, Law Office of                                                                                        - New York                                          , NY         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



NY



New York



Legal Services



Labor And Employment Law



                            Rappaport, Richard, Law Office of
                                    



 





















R 


Rappaport, Richard, Law Office of                                                                                       
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



112 MADISON AVE FL 6 NEW YORK, NY 10016
Get Directions



(212) 685-8999
www.rappaportlawoffice.com                                                                              





Business Info



 Founded 1996
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $255,587.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Labor And Employment Law
 Contacts Richard Rappaport                                                                                                       







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Rappaport, Richard, Law Office Of                                                                                        was founded in 1996, and is located at 112 Madison Ave Fl 6 in New York. Additional information is available at www.rappaportlawoffice.com                                                                               or by contacting Richard Rappaport                                                                                                        at (212) 685-8999. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







R

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Richard Rappaport - Wikipedia






















 






Richard Rappaport

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (May 2010) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




Richard Rappaport



1994 - The German Girl - Nos. 1 and 2



Born
1944 (age 72–73)
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania


Nationality
American


Education
Carnegie Mellon University, Brooklyn College


Known for
Painting


Richard Rappaport (born 1944 in Pittsburgh) is a classically trained painter of portraits and large-scale figurative works whose pictorial evolution has spiraled towards and away from the Renaissance ideal for half a century.
In his work, even when taking the image to abstraction, Rappaport keeps the iconic figure as primal source. Besides portraits of psychological depth, Rappaport, in the tradition of painting as an act of remembrance, borrows Christian iconography to represent the Holocaust, the Nigerian Civil War, and the war in Vietnam.
A former student and friend of Robert L. Lepper at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh, PA, Rappaport is one of the artists influenced by Lepper’s course “Individual and Social Analysis”. His 1989 paper “Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project”[1] is the principal source on Lepper’s influence on Andy Warhol, Philip Pearlstein, Mel Bochner, and Jonathan Borofsky when they were Lepper’s students.
Since 1981 Rappaport’s use of the advertisement pages of international art magazines as a place of exhibition has been his principal form of public presence. This includes issues of Art in America, Artforum, Flash Art, Bomb, Modern Painters, World Art, The New Criterion, and Limn.



Contents


1 Life and work

1.1 The "Carnegie Tech" Years: Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search
1.2 Ship of Fools, July 1966
1.3 The Paris Years: Iconic Abstractions, Joseph Accused
1.4 The New York Years, Portraits in Grattage, The Public Theatre Hangings
1.5 The Return to Pittsburgh, A Visit to Paris: The German Girl
1.6 Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning: A Commemoration


2 Awards and Exhibitions
3 References
4 External links



Life and work[edit]
From early on Rappaport showed unusual promise in drawing the human face making emotionally credible portraits of family and friends from his eighth year on of which the culminating work is the reverential drawing of his great-grandmother (1954) made soon after his tenth birthday. Then for three years, starting in fifth grade, the young artist attends the Carnegie Institute's (now The Carnegie) Tam O'Shanter art class which is followed at thirteen by a year of Saturday afternoons in traditional apprenticeship in painting with the realist/surrealist artist Abe Weiner. Already an accomplished draftsman at seventeen, Rappaport is awarded the gold medal in drawing in the National Scholastic Art & Writing Awards in the spring of 1962 before entering the Department of Painting & Design at Carnegie Institute of Technology (now Carnegie Mellon University) in Pittsburgh that autumn the same time his older brother Robert Rappaport, who would become the television art director of the Mike Douglas Show and the Miss Universe Pagent, enters the Drama Department in stage design.
The "Carnegie Tech" Years: Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search[edit]
One of the most significant works that will inform this artist's future practice, made while on Christmas vacation his first year at "Carnegie Tech", is the four foot high Self Nude (scratchboard) (1962) of himself waist-high, highlighting a bare arm, shoulder and half-face against the black background. It proves to be a watershed when eight years later the artist returns to the concept of scratchboard by adapting it to layers of oil paint on canvas in "grattage" works such as Joseph Accused (1971) in which the image is made by scratching through the smoothed, palette-knife applied top layer of cadmium red to the lighter mid-color of turquoise and yellow-white base.
In August 1963, the summer following his freshman year, Rappaport paints his first suite of mature portraits, which include those of Mrs. Ress (1963), Ann Weiner (1963), and the standing three-quarter length Self Nude (1963), whose straight-on depictions of character relate to the portraits of Alice Neel, whom the artist is unaware of at the time, winning for himself the art department's Leisser Award for work done independently and affording him the occasion of his first exhibition of these portraits lining its central hallway at the beginning of his sophomore year. His father, on seeing the show, gives him an account for art supplies which makes possible his painting large works on linen canvas for his remaining three years at school.




1964 - Burial of Christ - detail


From then on he is only nominally a student; choosing his themes independently and working outside of the classroom that sophomore year with his sights on Rembrant and Titian while painting the first state of his mother's portrait Woman with Red Hands (1963) and Burial of Christ (1964) whose stark representation, an homage to the medieval Villeneuve-les-Avignons Pieta, is the first of a number of works made over the years where he portrays himself in the role of the alienated outsider.




1965 - Family Portrait-detail


These are followed in his junior year by the double-portrait of the actors Michael Tucker and Laurie Jefferson (1965) and his own partial Family Portrait (1965) that portrays only his mother, younger brother Ronald and himself during the highly emotional period when his parents have separated. Executed on rabbit-skin glue sized but not primed linen canvas, the faces in both paintings are built up from the absorbent weave that owe much to the example of Edgar Degas - especially that of the artist's mother to Degas' Portrait of a Young Woman (1867).
That summer of 1965, in Six Characters in Search (1965), the artist paints himself as rebellious protagonist/target of ridecule and prosecutor of judgment that takes its cue from Michelangelo's Christ in the Last Judgment; and senior year Jewess Accused (1965) which shifts emphasis in the story of "Christ and the Woman Taken in Adultery" to express the ostracism and accusation of crimes levied against the Jews that lead to the Holocaust. This is followed in his last semester by We Are All Somnambulists (1966). All of which are painted from live models.




1965 - Six Characters in Search






1965 - Jewess Accused


However, Rappaport's work is out of phase with the dominant art movements emerging in the sixties: Pop Art, Minimalism, and Conceptualism, and at odds with New Realism whose program of objectivity in representing the human figure by eliminating all subjective response implying the spiritual dimension discredits the overt Romanticism in Rappaport's painting. Only Alice Neel and Larry Rivers in New York, Francis Bacon and Lucian Freud in England, and Balthus in France are privileged to paint figuratively with any response to an inner life given their subjects or any implied narrative. Consequently, Rappaport's practice is marginalized already as a student, and in these early works expressing universal themes of the human condition his painting takes on an autobiographical aspect.
Apart from painting, Rappaport is constantly drawing. His most evolved graphic series he does his sophomore year in a series of drawings, lithographs, and etchings executed directly from a theatrically lit display case at the Carnegie Museum of a naturally mumified skeletal figure buried in fetal position, which was already a fascination for the artist when a fifth grader at the museum's Tam-O'Shanter classes and to which, used as a symbolic motif of the Holocaust, the artist will return thirty-five years later in painting The Oven's Womb (1997), 119"x145", drawn in a simplified manner, as if cave painting, on a color field of cadmium red.
In the ground floor sculpture studios Rappaport regularly sees Jonathan Borofsky, who is a sculpture major two years ahead of him, and during his sophomore year becomes better acquainted with Mel Bochner, who having graduated five years before has returned to Pittsburgh for the year. As both come from the same neighborhood, Rappaport gives the older artist rides in the evenings to the campus where they work in the print room and from which Bochner often visits Robert L. Lepper in his studio just down the hallway and on returning shares his enthusiasm for Lepper's speculative conversations on art practice.
In the autumn of 1964, that following year, Rappaport takes Lepper's The Oakland Project and Retrospective classes, entitled "Individual and Social Analysis", and soon forms a close bond with the older man. However, while Rappaport is fascinated by Lepper's logic and eloquence on a broad range of perceptual and communicative issues; his direction cannot be categorized with that of Lepper's famous former students: Andy Warhol, Philip Pearlatein, Mel Bochner, and Jonathan Borofsky, who, made conscious of changing hierarchies of value due to the impact of the machine and media on society, are directly influenced by Lepper's work in industrial design and Bauhaus leanings addressing the potential of technology's role in contemporary art practice, which, along with Lepper's conceptual paradigm: communication as intention expressed and followed logically, leads to making art the focus for following human reason engaged in the perception of its own awareness - a strategy seen in Bochner's Conceptual practice.
Rappaport, as much as he remains devoted to Lepper for the next twenty-five years, and all the while following the progression of Lepper's ideas in the evolution of the above-mentioned artists' work, consequently leading to his writing in 1989 "Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project", cannot be considered in Lepper's "camp". (This will be made more evident some seventeen years after Lepper's death in his essay Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search that reviews Lepper's legacy four decades later.)
Instead, Rappaport keeps to his own agenda, already evident in the Burial of Christ painted the year before meeting Lepper, which merges in expressive figurative painting the autobiographical with the socio-political, which are options in artistic direction laid out in Lepper's introduction to his classes, and exemplify the expressive force in what Lepper is pointing to in The Retrospective, whose primary goal, bracketed-off from the socio-political, evokes the emotive, psychic power of unmediated memory in response to autobiographical material.
Most importantly, Rappaport's departure in the late 1960s from traditional brush painting to his employing grattage technique does owe a debt to Lepper's own example of arriving at the conclusion that the paintbrush was not his tool but those of the industrial fabricator were. And in looking back to the great figurative tradition of western art as a resource and inspiration, Rappaport is doing so informed by Lepper's late-modernist/postmodernist perspective and his injunction to allow for the unexpected by letting the process suggest where the work should go and not rush to expectations that set limitations on expression.
The autumn of 1964 proves to be an auspicious time when soon after beginning Robert Lepper's class, Rappaport meets Herbert A. Simon, one of the most influential social scientists of the 20th century, whose computer simulated pioneer work in decision making parallels the communicative functions in Lepper's conceptual strategies, and following Rappaport's gift of a lithograph drawing of Simon's daughter Barbara, which initiates their acquaintance, Simon becomes an early supporter and longtime friend of the young artist, and whose portrait Herbert A Simon (1987) Rappaport paints in the summer of 1987 for Carnegie Mellon University as its first Nobel Prize laureate on the faculty and which is followed a week later by Lepper's portrait.
Ship of Fools, July 1966[edit]




Ship of Fools by Richard Rappaport, 1966


Upon graduation in June 1966, Rappaport is offered a loft space on West 74th Street, New York for the summer where he paints his first work that is no longer dependent on live models but instead employs an expressively gestural execution in drawing the figures with large areas of washed-on color. Taking a cue from a photograph of Chagall painting his murals for Lincoln Center on the floor, as well as Japanese scroll painting in a book left by his benefactor which includes an image of a typhoon swept boat in the Mongol armada's failed invasion of Japan in the sixteenth century, Rappaport, with Hieronymus Bosch's version already in mind for its subject, begins painting Ship of Fools (1966) within hours of the announcement of the United States first bombing raids into North Vietnam escalating the war.
Ship of Fools not only marks a major historical event; artistically it marks a turning point from which the twenty-one-year-old artist enters into the beginning phase of a four-year evolution towards an iconographic figuration that in some works of 1970 comes close to reducing traces of the figurative element almost entirely.




1966 - Oratory Mural detail - the Annunciation


Rappaport's next major work in that evolution, the Oratory Mural (1966-1967), comes as a result of exhibiting Ship of Fools at Skibo Hall at Carnegie Mellon University in November 1966 when Father Philip Walsh of the Pittsburgh Oratory commissions Rappaport to paint a triptych for their proposed retreat house and arranges for the artist a studio space in the former chancellery behind St. Paul's Cathedral in Pittsburgh where the artist paints the canvasses on the floor in its Gothic library. The mural, declined, remains rolled for twenty years; whereupon, through the auspices of Michael A. Roosevelt, it finds a home on extended loan to the Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential, Philadelphia in 1987.




1967 - Oratory Mural Escape Through the Desert


In working out the iconography on this fourteen by twenty-five foot triptych, the artist becomes an admirer of the frescoes of Giotto; though only the "Escape through the Desert" on the left canvas of the Oratory Mural suggests openly that influence. And in general, in spite of the seriousness of the subject in Giotto's cycle on 'The Life of Christ" in the Scrovegni Chapel, there is a playfulness in the pantomime that informs its celebratory mood that Rappaport responds to in his mural and that is expressed in the decorative, modernist function of the gessoed patterns playing in tandem with the figurative representation.
On a structural level, it is in works a few years later, however hidden his example, where Giotto's condensed compositions within the square that collapse the architectural space, or as in the cycle on St. Francis in Assisi, the mountainous canyons in which his figures find themselves, that becomes a source of inspiration for Rappaport's more abstracted figurative works contained in shallow relief as in Valley of the Kings (1969) and Asleep by the Tomb (1970).
Giotto, however, is not alone as an iconographic source for the mural. In Robert Campin's Annunciation (1427-1432), the round table that discreetly separates the angel Gabriel from Mary becomes for Rappaport's image the "circle of acceptance" upon which Mary is about to place her hand, and where Rappaport adds above her head the face of another angel representing her consciousness of her son's future looking upwards to the Baptism, and from which evolves several years later into the surreal and abstracted motif of "courtship" in Providence in Motion (1969).
While working on the Oratory Mural, the artist having graduated, nonetheless, is given for a short time the privileged use of the print room at Carnegie Tech. Transcribing onto a large deeply bit etching plate a linear adaptation of his mother's portrait Woman with Red Hands (1963-1966), the artist fashions a severe icon of his mother which when combined with the motif in the etching of Evelyn Ress, with the double view of her head one dropping below the other as she falls asleep, becomes the prototype for a series of paintings that start with Mourning Clown (1967), that expresses the artist's sorrow over the death of his good friend Mrs. Ress, and The Work of Mourning (1968), that turns to the greater theme of the Holocaust, and which make a seamless progression into the works that evolve in France in the autumn of 1968.
The Paris Years: Iconic Abstractions, Joseph Accused[edit]
In September 1968, upon being awarded the Chaloner Prize through the Rome Prize competition, Rappaport begins what would be an almost three-year sojourn in France; first living in Vincennes and the following year, through the auspices of Darthea Speyer, the American-in-Paris gallerist, is awarded a residency at the Cite Internationale des Arts.




1968 - Father, Vulture, Holy Butterfly


Although Picasso's Weeping Woman is suggested in these works in Paris, as is Tutankhamun's gilded face mask and Rouault's The King, in Biafran Madonna 1st ver. (1968) and Rabbi (1968), along with the formal structure in the Romanesque altarpieces of Cimabue in Father, Vulture, Holy Butterfly (1968), and the paint-encrusted shield-like shapes of Oceanic effigies in Death Has No Master (1970); it is his own etchings, and above all, the etching process itself: from rolling a coating of wax onto the plate's surface - to drawing into that wax ground - to scraping away unwanted lines after the plate is bit in the acid bath that leads Rappaport to the way he will soon execute in paint in a two-stage process the works of 1969 and 1970 that are shaped by scraping away the multiple layers of paint applied in the initial stage of the image both when malleable and once dry to form reductively the final image - a process to which the artist gives the general term "in grattage". As such, the tactile, almost violent manner, in the acknowledgment of process and material in forming these primitive/modernist figurative icons which are as much carved and sculpted as painted and the resulting symbolism that explores the devastation of time upon man's endeavors or portrays malevolence against the innocent anticipates Neo-Expressionism and relates to the work of Anselm Kiefer.




1971 - Joseph Accused-detail


Two years later in the autumn of 1970, while his solo exhibition of the more recent of these "iconic abstractions" is hanging at the Cite des Arts, Rappaport, upon reading Thomas Mann's "Joseph and His Brothers", begins Joseph Accused (1970-1971) followed by Joseph in the Pit (1971) and Jacob in Mourning (1971) which are made in a scratchboard-like technique in which the drawn image is scratched through the dry surface layer of cadmium red into the base layers of turquoise and yellow-white on the canvas - a method to which the artist also gives the term "grattage", and which its effect in Joseph Accused suggests ancient Egyptian temple wall reliefs precisely cut into red granite in which the figures are styled as a consequence in shallow space, deliberately flattened and silhouetted by overstated contours.
The ritualized gesture of Joseph's arms extending downwards, as if bound together to two open hands, a sign of supplication and innocence, is a studied and mimetic quotation. This combined with the addition of the second arm and hand is an obvious restructuring of the desperately outstretched arm and hand of the man being strangled in Max Beckmann's Die Nacht, which Rapport sees as a symbolic precursor to "Kristallnacht", the Nazi "Night of Broken Glass", the night of terror perpetrated on the Jewish community on November 7, 1938, generally considered marking the beginning of the Holocaust. Consequently, Rapport considers his representation of the Biblical story of Joseph Accused, with its formalistic and iconographic pictorial dependency on the art of Max Beckmann, as an iconographic statement for modern history to the horrific anti-Semitism in Nazi Germany and a testimony to the theme 'stranger in a strange land' in Thomas Mann's four book epic honoring the ancient Hebraic spiritual quest.
The New York Years, Portraits in Grattage, The Public Theatre Hangings[edit]
Throughout most of the 1970s, while simultaneously painting works that have evolved from the iconic abstractions of Paris, Rappaport makes over twenty portraits in grattage beginning with the double portrait of Jake and Esther Schwartz (1971) in Philadelphia while staying at his brother's on his return from France in the summer of 1971 for the sculptor Barbara Schwartz, the model for Potiphar's Wife in Joseph Accused; then once in New York, Luke (1973) that will be shown along with works by Warhol and Philip Pearlstein in New York City / Carnegie Mellon Alumni exhibition at Westbroadway Gallery in 1976, the tapestry-like devotional icon of the guru Baba Muktananda (1976-1977), and its technical twin: The White Sisters (1976-1979), that evolves through several metamorphosis, then finally scraped-down to a bare tint of color on the canvas threads leaving only the lyrical contours as an Art Nouveau tableau, finished just months before the artist's return to traditional brush painting with The Barren Womb (1979).




1972 - Jack & Richard - Detail


But before his New York period begins, the artist is stricken and operated for pericarditis in the spring of 1972, spending most of the summer at his brother's in Philadelphia convalescing before needing a second operation in early September. Then two theatre friends of his brother's from the Carnegie Tech Drama Department invite the artist to New York by commissioning their portraits in grattage. The first, the double portrait of Jack & Richard (1972) of the stage designer Jack Doepp and aspiring opera singer Richard Magpion is made during the artist's stay at Jack's studio on West 85th Street for the remainder of the year and owes the decorative aspect and theatrical staging of the two figures emerging from the densely luminous red surface to Gustav Klimt's gilded paintings. The portrait, nonetheless, is declined and five years later in 1977 is purchased by Pamela Newhouse. The second, the more sober portrait of Dean Brown (1973), is finished that spring when the artist moves to East Seventh Street in the East Village, Manhattan.




1971 - Jacob in Mourning


In 1974, at the home of Conde Nast publisher S.I. Newhouse Jr., Rappaport is introduced to Joseph Papp, the founding director of the New York Public Theatre, who offers to hang the nine feet high Joseph in the Pit and Jacob in Mourning in the Public Theatre's inner-lobby. They are installed that autumn of 1974 and remain there till the autumn of 1977.
Soon after their return the artist reworks Joseph in the Pit painting Joseph's hand red to stand for the painting of blood on the doorposts as a sign to warn away the Angel of Death in the Passover story of "Exodus", compounding it with the original story in "Genesis", and adding the huge face of a female apparition, suggesting that angel, drawn from the portrait Catherine Kirkwood (1977), that, with the artist being the model for Joseph, adds an autobiographical layer to this episode of Joseph's struggle with self-doubt that prefigures the story of Jesus in the New Testament's "Christ on the Mount of Olives". In this, Rappaport follows the Western art practice of the continuous narrative - the layering of stories separated by centuries while alluding to stories further into the future.
Attacked late at night by a knifer while walking through Tompkins Square in the East Village in early 1978, Rappaport, shaken by the incident and discouraged after his paintings are taken down at the Public Theatre, abandons his apartment on East Seventh Street and spends more than several months in Washington, D.C. before moving to Brooklyn in 1979 when he enters the masters program at Brooklyn College with the thought of eventually teaching, earning his M.F.A. in 1981.
Given a portion of his modest inheritance when his father is stricken by a major heart attack, Rappaport begins in the December 1981 issue of Art in America his first suite of multiple ad pages that continue in the following issues through April 1982. Coinciding with that last issue in April, Rappaport stages an exhibit in a carriage-house studio at 29 Downing Street in the West Village (NYC), of seven current paintings including The Abode (1981) and White Madonna (1981) attracting Judd Tully, who intrigued by Rappaport's independent media campaign, includes mention of it in his review for that summer's issue of Flash Art International.
Two years later Rappaport joins the cooperative Blue Mountain Gallery in New York where he has five solo exhibitions through 1991.
The Return to Pittsburgh, A Visit to Paris: The German Girl[edit]
In 1985 he returns to Pittsburgh. Then after a series of seven self-portraits made in the summer of 1986, a number of which are shown with Blue Madonna (1986) at Blue Mountain Gallery towards the end of that year; that following summer, upon being commissioned by Herbert Simon to paint his official portrait for Carnegie Mellon University, the artist also begins a series of elders and former teachers which includes that of Robert L. Lepper (1987), writing in 1989 Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project as a tribute to his former teacher who leaves a copy of it with his papers in the Carnegie Mellon University faculty archives.
A short three-month sojourn to Italy in late summer of 1989 provides the artist the occasion to leave the expressionism of Buddha from the Cross (1989) and Red Ashen Skies (1989 / 2010) painting two works that restate in a more traditional manner standard Renaissance themes: the first, a baptism, later renamed Narcissus (1989 / 2007) painted in Florence in August and September and followed that October in the Sienna countryside with an Expulsion from the Garden (1989 / 1992). Both early states of these works are shown in the artist's last exhibition at Blue Mountain Gallery in New York in late December 1990 into early January 1991.
After a romantic encounter in April 1994 while visiting friends in Paris, the artist returns to France that autumn moving into a garden studio in Vincennes for ten months; there painting in a rite of exorcism the self-portrait: The Performer (1994) as counterpart to the series of single female nudes: The German Girl which owe their eroticism to the example of Egon Schiele but without the latter's explicitness. An exhibition of these paintings is shown as "La noia alemanya nua" at Galeria Magdalena Baxeras in Barcelona in December 1995 following an introduction by the Cuban photographer Herman Puig, who, having photographed Rappaport in the Vincennes studio, has invited the artist to visit Barcelona. Four of Puig's photographs of the artist sitting by his paintings are reproduced on advertisement pages in the Flash Art November/December 1995 issue and in Artforum in the November 1995, December 1995, and January 1996 issues announcing the Barcelona exhibition. These independently produced reproductions begin a new cycle of the artist's ad pages as exhibition site that run till 2003 in some thirty issues of these and other international art journals that include multiple page presentations in Bomb, Modern Painters, World Art, and Limn.
Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning: A Commemoration[edit]




1996 - Ashes in the Wind


Then continuing painting in a similar manner, the artist once back in Pittsburgh changes themes painting iconographic images of individual female figures symbolic of the victims of the Holocaust: Ashes in the Wind (1996), Madonna of the Flames (1996), Schneeloch (1996), Freeze (1996), The Chamber (1996), and Furnace Dancer (1997); and from there shifting to the motif of the skeletal figure buried in fetal position that the artist had drawn when a sophomore at Carnegie Tech and now drawn in a manner that suggests cave painting on very large canvasses washed in cadmium red in The Oven's Womb (1997).




1997 - The Oven's Womb


Then following 9/11, in the December 2001 issue of Artforum Rappaport places on an ad page a photograph from 1966 with himself standing by Ship of fools (1966) with a caption ending in "It was a time when dossiers were made on anyone who openly had concerns about our foreign policy." addressing the historical parallel with the proposed restrictions on free speech and debate as the country prepares for war.
In its September 2002 issue, Artforum prints Rappaport's letter-to-the-editor responding to Linda Nochlin's review Mirroring Evil: Nazi Imagery / Recent Art, published in the Summer 2002 issue on the exhibition of the same held at the Jewish Museum in New York.
In 2004 Rappaport begins writing his Memoir Portraits & Passages which goes on-line in late August 2005.
In February 2005 within two weeks of the 60th anniversary of the liberation of Auschwitz, Rappaport exhibits the Holocaust images from 1996 and 1997 in Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning at Garfield Artworks in Pittsburgh.




2010 - Lightning on Sinai with Artist


The artist continues this theme four years later in paintings suggesting crucifixions drawn in the manner of Michelangelo's conceptual sketches on the subject - but here the male figures are without crosses, nine feet high on washes of cadmium red in To Leap into the Arms of the Eternal (2009), and Lightning on Sinai (2010), and in the striated washes of Storm Swept (2011). Though formally iconographic, unlike the ironic detachment prevailing in Postmodern pastiche and parody, they are set at no psychological distance from the viewer and instead call for a meditative and empathetic response. Such a commemoration for the victims of Nazi hatred, stretching back forty-five years to Jewess Accused (1965), here painted with reticence and deep respect for the human being, is a parallel expression to the works addressing the disastrous consequences of barbarity as seen from the opposite side of that dark history: those of Anselm Kiefer.
Although one might wish to make a categorial statement on Rappaport's work, given its emotional undercurrent, its often painful subject-matter and expressive execution; it may be incorrect to place the whole body of work solely on the expressionist side of the Classical/Romantic divide without acknowledging that in his work as a whole there is a strong sense of formal structure and a tendency towards finding equalibrium that plays a reciprocal and balancing role to the more expressive dynamic. And this may explain its spiralling evolution; whereupon, once reaching a saturation of effect in a period of work, the artist returns to a grounding in order, simplicity, and coherence, and always with reverence for the dignity of the body and nobility of the human face.
A more complete catalogue of Rappaport's work can be found on Wikimedia Commons.
Awards and Exhibitions[edit]

1962 - Scholastic Art & Writing Awards,[2] the National Gold Medal in Drawing.
1966 - Solo Exhibition at Skibo hall, Carnegie Mellon University.
1967 - Solo Exhibition of the "Oratory Mural" at Skibo hall, Carnegie Mellon University.
1967 - Solo Exhibition at the University of Chicago - Lexington Studio Gallery, Chicago.
1968 - The Chaloner Prize,[3] as a finalist in the American Academy in Rome Prize Competition.[4]
1969 - Group exhibition, "Jeunes artistes americans" at le Centre Cultural Americaine, Paris.[5]
1970 - Solo exhibition at le Cité Internationale des Arts, Paris.[6]
1974 - 1977 Installation - "Joseph in the Pit", "Jacob in Mourning", the Joseph Papp Public Theater, New York
1974 - Solo Exhibition - South Houston Gallery, SoHo, New York.
1976 - "Carnigie Mellon/NYC Alumni Show", West Broadway Gallery, SoHo, New York.
1982 - "29 Downing Street", New York City[7]
1983, 1984, 1986, 1989, 1991 - Solo exhibitions of paintings at the Blue Mountain Gallery, SoHo, New York City.[8]
1987 - Installation of the "Oratory Mural" on extended loan to the Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential, Philadelphia.[9]
1995 - Solo exhibition - "The German Girl Nude" ("La noia alemanya nua") at Magdalena Baxeras Galleria d'Arte, Barcelona
1997 - Group exhibition "Go Figure" at the University of Rhode Island, Kingston.
2005 - "Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning", Garfield Artworks, Pittsburgh.[10]
2007 - Group exhibition, "Garden Show: In Full Bloom" Space Gallery, Pittsburgh.
2011 - "Rappaport Unblurred", International Children's Art Gallery, Pittsburgh.

References[edit]


^ "Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project". Worldcat.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "National Scholastic Art & Writing Awards". Artandwriting.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "Chaloner Prize". Siris-archives.si.edu. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "American Academy in Rome". Aarome.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ Service Americane d'information et des relations cultural, "Jeunes Artistes American", review of same, Informations & Documents, 15 October 1969: 20
^ "Le Cite Internationale des Arts". Citedesartsparis.net. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ Judd Tully, "Richard Rappaport, 29 Downing St." review of same, Flash Art International, no. 108 (Summer 1982).
^ "Blue Mountain Gallery". Blue Mountain Gallery. 2013-01-25. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "iahp.org". iahp.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "Works of Mourning, review of same, The Jewish Chronicle 3 February 2005". Pittchron.com. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Richard Rappaport.



Rappaport’s website, "Portraits & Passages," is his memoir illustrated by his works.
Article in Pittsburgh City Paper, on exhibition at International Children's Art Gallery (July 21, 2011) - Venerable painter Richard Rappaport discusses five of his works.
Article in Portuguese Wikipedia: "Pintura nos Estados Unidos", surveying painting in the United States from colonial times to the present, citing Rappaport's work along with that of two older artists as "good examples of the persistence of expressive figurative painting during its phase of ostracism and its recovery in the mid-1970s" and including reproductions of Jewess Accused (1965) and Self-Portrait (1986): "Philip Guston, Richard Rappaport e Chaim Goldberg sao bons exemplos da persistencia da pintura figurativa durante sua fase de octracismo e de sua recuperacao em meados dos anos 1970."
For a gallery of Rappaport's work on Wikimedia Commons click here. Also included is commentary about the work on the Discussion tabs.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Richard_Rappaport&oldid=786928041"					
Categories: 1944 birthsLiving peopleAmerican artists20th-century American paintersAmerican male painters21st-century American paintersAmerican printmakersCarnegie Mellon University College of Fine Arts alumniArtists from PittsburghCarnegie Mellon University alumniHidden categories: BLP articles lacking sources from May 2010All BLP articles lacking sourcesArticles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 22 June 2017, at 12:09.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Richard Rappaport - Wikipedia






















 






Richard Rappaport

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (May 2010) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




Richard Rappaport



1994 - The German Girl - Nos. 1 and 2



Born
1944 (age 72–73)
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania


Nationality
American


Education
Carnegie Mellon University, Brooklyn College


Known for
Painting


Richard Rappaport (born 1944 in Pittsburgh) is a classically trained painter of portraits and large-scale figurative works whose pictorial evolution has spiraled towards and away from the Renaissance ideal for half a century.
In his work, even when taking the image to abstraction, Rappaport keeps the iconic figure as primal source. Besides portraits of psychological depth, Rappaport, in the tradition of painting as an act of remembrance, borrows Christian iconography to represent the Holocaust, the Nigerian Civil War, and the war in Vietnam.
A former student and friend of Robert L. Lepper at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh, PA, Rappaport is one of the artists influenced by Lepper’s course “Individual and Social Analysis”. His 1989 paper “Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project”[1] is the principal source on Lepper’s influence on Andy Warhol, Philip Pearlstein, Mel Bochner, and Jonathan Borofsky when they were Lepper’s students.
Since 1981 Rappaport’s use of the advertisement pages of international art magazines as a place of exhibition has been his principal form of public presence. This includes issues of Art in America, Artforum, Flash Art, Bomb, Modern Painters, World Art, The New Criterion, and Limn.



Contents


1 Life and work

1.1 The "Carnegie Tech" Years: Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search
1.2 Ship of Fools, July 1966
1.3 The Paris Years: Iconic Abstractions, Joseph Accused
1.4 The New York Years, Portraits in Grattage, The Public Theatre Hangings
1.5 The Return to Pittsburgh, A Visit to Paris: The German Girl
1.6 Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning: A Commemoration


2 Awards and Exhibitions
3 References
4 External links



Life and work[edit]
From early on Rappaport showed unusual promise in drawing the human face making emotionally credible portraits of family and friends from his eighth year on of which the culminating work is the reverential drawing of his great-grandmother (1954) made soon after his tenth birthday. Then for three years, starting in fifth grade, the young artist attends the Carnegie Institute's (now The Carnegie) Tam O'Shanter art class which is followed at thirteen by a year of Saturday afternoons in traditional apprenticeship in painting with the realist/surrealist artist Abe Weiner. Already an accomplished draftsman at seventeen, Rappaport is awarded the gold medal in drawing in the National Scholastic Art & Writing Awards in the spring of 1962 before entering the Department of Painting & Design at Carnegie Institute of Technology (now Carnegie Mellon University) in Pittsburgh that autumn the same time his older brother Robert Rappaport, who would become the television art director of the Mike Douglas Show and the Miss Universe Pagent, enters the Drama Department in stage design.
The "Carnegie Tech" Years: Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search[edit]
One of the most significant works that will inform this artist's future practice, made while on Christmas vacation his first year at "Carnegie Tech", is the four foot high Self Nude (scratchboard) (1962) of himself waist-high, highlighting a bare arm, shoulder and half-face against the black background. It proves to be a watershed when eight years later the artist returns to the concept of scratchboard by adapting it to layers of oil paint on canvas in "grattage" works such as Joseph Accused (1971) in which the image is made by scratching through the smoothed, palette-knife applied top layer of cadmium red to the lighter mid-color of turquoise and yellow-white base.
In August 1963, the summer following his freshman year, Rappaport paints his first suite of mature portraits, which include those of Mrs. Ress (1963), Ann Weiner (1963), and the standing three-quarter length Self Nude (1963), whose straight-on depictions of character relate to the portraits of Alice Neel, whom the artist is unaware of at the time, winning for himself the art department's Leisser Award for work done independently and affording him the occasion of his first exhibition of these portraits lining its central hallway at the beginning of his sophomore year. His father, on seeing the show, gives him an account for art supplies which makes possible his painting large works on linen canvas for his remaining three years at school.




1964 - Burial of Christ - detail


From then on he is only nominally a student; choosing his themes independently and working outside of the classroom that sophomore year with his sights on Rembrant and Titian while painting the first state of his mother's portrait Woman with Red Hands (1963) and Burial of Christ (1964) whose stark representation, an homage to the medieval Villeneuve-les-Avignons Pieta, is the first of a number of works made over the years where he portrays himself in the role of the alienated outsider.




1965 - Family Portrait-detail


These are followed in his junior year by the double-portrait of the actors Michael Tucker and Laurie Jefferson (1965) and his own partial Family Portrait (1965) that portrays only his mother, younger brother Ronald and himself during the highly emotional period when his parents have separated. Executed on rabbit-skin glue sized but not primed linen canvas, the faces in both paintings are built up from the absorbent weave that owe much to the example of Edgar Degas - especially that of the artist's mother to Degas' Portrait of a Young Woman (1867).
That summer of 1965, in Six Characters in Search (1965), the artist paints himself as rebellious protagonist/target of ridecule and prosecutor of judgment that takes its cue from Michelangelo's Christ in the Last Judgment; and senior year Jewess Accused (1965) which shifts emphasis in the story of "Christ and the Woman Taken in Adultery" to express the ostracism and accusation of crimes levied against the Jews that lead to the Holocaust. This is followed in his last semester by We Are All Somnambulists (1966). All of which are painted from live models.




1965 - Six Characters in Search






1965 - Jewess Accused


However, Rappaport's work is out of phase with the dominant art movements emerging in the sixties: Pop Art, Minimalism, and Conceptualism, and at odds with New Realism whose program of objectivity in representing the human figure by eliminating all subjective response implying the spiritual dimension discredits the overt Romanticism in Rappaport's painting. Only Alice Neel and Larry Rivers in New York, Francis Bacon and Lucian Freud in England, and Balthus in France are privileged to paint figuratively with any response to an inner life given their subjects or any implied narrative. Consequently, Rappaport's practice is marginalized already as a student, and in these early works expressing universal themes of the human condition his painting takes on an autobiographical aspect.
Apart from painting, Rappaport is constantly drawing. His most evolved graphic series he does his sophomore year in a series of drawings, lithographs, and etchings executed directly from a theatrically lit display case at the Carnegie Museum of a naturally mumified skeletal figure buried in fetal position, which was already a fascination for the artist when a fifth grader at the museum's Tam-O'Shanter classes and to which, used as a symbolic motif of the Holocaust, the artist will return thirty-five years later in painting The Oven's Womb (1997), 119"x145", drawn in a simplified manner, as if cave painting, on a color field of cadmium red.
In the ground floor sculpture studios Rappaport regularly sees Jonathan Borofsky, who is a sculpture major two years ahead of him, and during his sophomore year becomes better acquainted with Mel Bochner, who having graduated five years before has returned to Pittsburgh for the year. As both come from the same neighborhood, Rappaport gives the older artist rides in the evenings to the campus where they work in the print room and from which Bochner often visits Robert L. Lepper in his studio just down the hallway and on returning shares his enthusiasm for Lepper's speculative conversations on art practice.
In the autumn of 1964, that following year, Rappaport takes Lepper's The Oakland Project and Retrospective classes, entitled "Individual and Social Analysis", and soon forms a close bond with the older man. However, while Rappaport is fascinated by Lepper's logic and eloquence on a broad range of perceptual and communicative issues; his direction cannot be categorized with that of Lepper's famous former students: Andy Warhol, Philip Pearlatein, Mel Bochner, and Jonathan Borofsky, who, made conscious of changing hierarchies of value due to the impact of the machine and media on society, are directly influenced by Lepper's work in industrial design and Bauhaus leanings addressing the potential of technology's role in contemporary art practice, which, along with Lepper's conceptual paradigm: communication as intention expressed and followed logically, leads to making art the focus for following human reason engaged in the perception of its own awareness - a strategy seen in Bochner's Conceptual practice.
Rappaport, as much as he remains devoted to Lepper for the next twenty-five years, and all the while following the progression of Lepper's ideas in the evolution of the above-mentioned artists' work, consequently leading to his writing in 1989 "Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project", cannot be considered in Lepper's "camp". (This will be made more evident some seventeen years after Lepper's death in his essay Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search that reviews Lepper's legacy four decades later.)
Instead, Rappaport keeps to his own agenda, already evident in the Burial of Christ painted the year before meeting Lepper, which merges in expressive figurative painting the autobiographical with the socio-political, which are options in artistic direction laid out in Lepper's introduction to his classes, and exemplify the expressive force in what Lepper is pointing to in The Retrospective, whose primary goal, bracketed-off from the socio-political, evokes the emotive, psychic power of unmediated memory in response to autobiographical material.
Most importantly, Rappaport's departure in the late 1960s from traditional brush painting to his employing grattage technique does owe a debt to Lepper's own example of arriving at the conclusion that the paintbrush was not his tool but those of the industrial fabricator were. And in looking back to the great figurative tradition of western art as a resource and inspiration, Rappaport is doing so informed by Lepper's late-modernist/postmodernist perspective and his injunction to allow for the unexpected by letting the process suggest where the work should go and not rush to expectations that set limitations on expression.
The autumn of 1964 proves to be an auspicious time when soon after beginning Robert Lepper's class, Rappaport meets Herbert A. Simon, one of the most influential social scientists of the 20th century, whose computer simulated pioneer work in decision making parallels the communicative functions in Lepper's conceptual strategies, and following Rappaport's gift of a lithograph drawing of Simon's daughter Barbara, which initiates their acquaintance, Simon becomes an early supporter and longtime friend of the young artist, and whose portrait Herbert A Simon (1987) Rappaport paints in the summer of 1987 for Carnegie Mellon University as its first Nobel Prize laureate on the faculty and which is followed a week later by Lepper's portrait.
Ship of Fools, July 1966[edit]




Ship of Fools by Richard Rappaport, 1966


Upon graduation in June 1966, Rappaport is offered a loft space on West 74th Street, New York for the summer where he paints his first work that is no longer dependent on live models but instead employs an expressively gestural execution in drawing the figures with large areas of washed-on color. Taking a cue from a photograph of Chagall painting his murals for Lincoln Center on the floor, as well as Japanese scroll painting in a book left by his benefactor which includes an image of a typhoon swept boat in the Mongol armada's failed invasion of Japan in the sixteenth century, Rappaport, with Hieronymus Bosch's version already in mind for its subject, begins painting Ship of Fools (1966) within hours of the announcement of the United States first bombing raids into North Vietnam escalating the war.
Ship of Fools not only marks a major historical event; artistically it marks a turning point from which the twenty-one-year-old artist enters into the beginning phase of a four-year evolution towards an iconographic figuration that in some works of 1970 comes close to reducing traces of the figurative element almost entirely.




1966 - Oratory Mural detail - the Annunciation


Rappaport's next major work in that evolution, the Oratory Mural (1966-1967), comes as a result of exhibiting Ship of Fools at Skibo Hall at Carnegie Mellon University in November 1966 when Father Philip Walsh of the Pittsburgh Oratory commissions Rappaport to paint a triptych for their proposed retreat house and arranges for the artist a studio space in the former chancellery behind St. Paul's Cathedral in Pittsburgh where the artist paints the canvasses on the floor in its Gothic library. The mural, declined, remains rolled for twenty years; whereupon, through the auspices of Michael A. Roosevelt, it finds a home on extended loan to the Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential, Philadelphia in 1987.




1967 - Oratory Mural Escape Through the Desert


In working out the iconography on this fourteen by twenty-five foot triptych, the artist becomes an admirer of the frescoes of Giotto; though only the "Escape through the Desert" on the left canvas of the Oratory Mural suggests openly that influence. And in general, in spite of the seriousness of the subject in Giotto's cycle on 'The Life of Christ" in the Scrovegni Chapel, there is a playfulness in the pantomime that informs its celebratory mood that Rappaport responds to in his mural and that is expressed in the decorative, modernist function of the gessoed patterns playing in tandem with the figurative representation.
On a structural level, it is in works a few years later, however hidden his example, where Giotto's condensed compositions within the square that collapse the architectural space, or as in the cycle on St. Francis in Assisi, the mountainous canyons in which his figures find themselves, that becomes a source of inspiration for Rappaport's more abstracted figurative works contained in shallow relief as in Valley of the Kings (1969) and Asleep by the Tomb (1970).
Giotto, however, is not alone as an iconographic source for the mural. In Robert Campin's Annunciation (1427-1432), the round table that discreetly separates the angel Gabriel from Mary becomes for Rappaport's image the "circle of acceptance" upon which Mary is about to place her hand, and where Rappaport adds above her head the face of another angel representing her consciousness of her son's future looking upwards to the Baptism, and from which evolves several years later into the surreal and abstracted motif of "courtship" in Providence in Motion (1969).
While working on the Oratory Mural, the artist having graduated, nonetheless, is given for a short time the privileged use of the print room at Carnegie Tech. Transcribing onto a large deeply bit etching plate a linear adaptation of his mother's portrait Woman with Red Hands (1963-1966), the artist fashions a severe icon of his mother which when combined with the motif in the etching of Evelyn Ress, with the double view of her head one dropping below the other as she falls asleep, becomes the prototype for a series of paintings that start with Mourning Clown (1967), that expresses the artist's sorrow over the death of his good friend Mrs. Ress, and The Work of Mourning (1968), that turns to the greater theme of the Holocaust, and which make a seamless progression into the works that evolve in France in the autumn of 1968.
The Paris Years: Iconic Abstractions, Joseph Accused[edit]
In September 1968, upon being awarded the Chaloner Prize through the Rome Prize competition, Rappaport begins what would be an almost three-year sojourn in France; first living in Vincennes and the following year, through the auspices of Darthea Speyer, the American-in-Paris gallerist, is awarded a residency at the Cite Internationale des Arts.




1968 - Father, Vulture, Holy Butterfly


Although Picasso's Weeping Woman is suggested in these works in Paris, as is Tutankhamun's gilded face mask and Rouault's The King, in Biafran Madonna 1st ver. (1968) and Rabbi (1968), along with the formal structure in the Romanesque altarpieces of Cimabue in Father, Vulture, Holy Butterfly (1968), and the paint-encrusted shield-like shapes of Oceanic effigies in Death Has No Master (1970); it is his own etchings, and above all, the etching process itself: from rolling a coating of wax onto the plate's surface - to drawing into that wax ground - to scraping away unwanted lines after the plate is bit in the acid bath that leads Rappaport to the way he will soon execute in paint in a two-stage process the works of 1969 and 1970 that are shaped by scraping away the multiple layers of paint applied in the initial stage of the image both when malleable and once dry to form reductively the final image - a process to which the artist gives the general term "in grattage". As such, the tactile, almost violent manner, in the acknowledgment of process and material in forming these primitive/modernist figurative icons which are as much carved and sculpted as painted and the resulting symbolism that explores the devastation of time upon man's endeavors or portrays malevolence against the innocent anticipates Neo-Expressionism and relates to the work of Anselm Kiefer.




1971 - Joseph Accused-detail


Two years later in the autumn of 1970, while his solo exhibition of the more recent of these "iconic abstractions" is hanging at the Cite des Arts, Rappaport, upon reading Thomas Mann's "Joseph and His Brothers", begins Joseph Accused (1970-1971) followed by Joseph in the Pit (1971) and Jacob in Mourning (1971) which are made in a scratchboard-like technique in which the drawn image is scratched through the dry surface layer of cadmium red into the base layers of turquoise and yellow-white on the canvas - a method to which the artist also gives the term "grattage", and which its effect in Joseph Accused suggests ancient Egyptian temple wall reliefs precisely cut into red granite in which the figures are styled as a consequence in shallow space, deliberately flattened and silhouetted by overstated contours.
The ritualized gesture of Joseph's arms extending downwards, as if bound together to two open hands, a sign of supplication and innocence, is a studied and mimetic quotation. This combined with the addition of the second arm and hand is an obvious restructuring of the desperately outstretched arm and hand of the man being strangled in Max Beckmann's Die Nacht, which Rapport sees as a symbolic precursor to "Kristallnacht", the Nazi "Night of Broken Glass", the night of terror perpetrated on the Jewish community on November 7, 1938, generally considered marking the beginning of the Holocaust. Consequently, Rapport considers his representation of the Biblical story of Joseph Accused, with its formalistic and iconographic pictorial dependency on the art of Max Beckmann, as an iconographic statement for modern history to the horrific anti-Semitism in Nazi Germany and a testimony to the theme 'stranger in a strange land' in Thomas Mann's four book epic honoring the ancient Hebraic spiritual quest.
The New York Years, Portraits in Grattage, The Public Theatre Hangings[edit]
Throughout most of the 1970s, while simultaneously painting works that have evolved from the iconic abstractions of Paris, Rappaport makes over twenty portraits in grattage beginning with the double portrait of Jake and Esther Schwartz (1971) in Philadelphia while staying at his brother's on his return from France in the summer of 1971 for the sculptor Barbara Schwartz, the model for Potiphar's Wife in Joseph Accused; then once in New York, Luke (1973) that will be shown along with works by Warhol and Philip Pearlstein in New York City / Carnegie Mellon Alumni exhibition at Westbroadway Gallery in 1976, the tapestry-like devotional icon of the guru Baba Muktananda (1976-1977), and its technical twin: The White Sisters (1976-1979), that evolves through several metamorphosis, then finally scraped-down to a bare tint of color on the canvas threads leaving only the lyrical contours as an Art Nouveau tableau, finished just months before the artist's return to traditional brush painting with The Barren Womb (1979).




1972 - Jack & Richard - Detail


But before his New York period begins, the artist is stricken and operated for pericarditis in the spring of 1972, spending most of the summer at his brother's in Philadelphia convalescing before needing a second operation in early September. Then two theatre friends of his brother's from the Carnegie Tech Drama Department invite the artist to New York by commissioning their portraits in grattage. The first, the double portrait of Jack & Richard (1972) of the stage designer Jack Doepp and aspiring opera singer Richard Magpion is made during the artist's stay at Jack's studio on West 85th Street for the remainder of the year and owes the decorative aspect and theatrical staging of the two figures emerging from the densely luminous red surface to Gustav Klimt's gilded paintings. The portrait, nonetheless, is declined and five years later in 1977 is purchased by Pamela Newhouse. The second, the more sober portrait of Dean Brown (1973), is finished that spring when the artist moves to East Seventh Street in the East Village, Manhattan.




1971 - Jacob in Mourning


In 1974, at the home of Conde Nast publisher S.I. Newhouse Jr., Rappaport is introduced to Joseph Papp, the founding director of the New York Public Theatre, who offers to hang the nine feet high Joseph in the Pit and Jacob in Mourning in the Public Theatre's inner-lobby. They are installed that autumn of 1974 and remain there till the autumn of 1977.
Soon after their return the artist reworks Joseph in the Pit painting Joseph's hand red to stand for the painting of blood on the doorposts as a sign to warn away the Angel of Death in the Passover story of "Exodus", compounding it with the original story in "Genesis", and adding the huge face of a female apparition, suggesting that angel, drawn from the portrait Catherine Kirkwood (1977), that, with the artist being the model for Joseph, adds an autobiographical layer to this episode of Joseph's struggle with self-doubt that prefigures the story of Jesus in the New Testament's "Christ on the Mount of Olives". In this, Rappaport follows the Western art practice of the continuous narrative - the layering of stories separated by centuries while alluding to stories further into the future.
Attacked late at night by a knifer while walking through Tompkins Square in the East Village in early 1978, Rappaport, shaken by the incident and discouraged after his paintings are taken down at the Public Theatre, abandons his apartment on East Seventh Street and spends more than several months in Washington, D.C. before moving to Brooklyn in 1979 when he enters the masters program at Brooklyn College with the thought of eventually teaching, earning his M.F.A. in 1981.
Given a portion of his modest inheritance when his father is stricken by a major heart attack, Rappaport begins in the December 1981 issue of Art in America his first suite of multiple ad pages that continue in the following issues through April 1982. Coinciding with that last issue in April, Rappaport stages an exhibit in a carriage-house studio at 29 Downing Street in the West Village (NYC), of seven current paintings including The Abode (1981) and White Madonna (1981) attracting Judd Tully, who intrigued by Rappaport's independent media campaign, includes mention of it in his review for that summer's issue of Flash Art International.
Two years later Rappaport joins the cooperative Blue Mountain Gallery in New York where he has five solo exhibitions through 1991.
The Return to Pittsburgh, A Visit to Paris: The German Girl[edit]
In 1985 he returns to Pittsburgh. Then after a series of seven self-portraits made in the summer of 1986, a number of which are shown with Blue Madonna (1986) at Blue Mountain Gallery towards the end of that year; that following summer, upon being commissioned by Herbert Simon to paint his official portrait for Carnegie Mellon University, the artist also begins a series of elders and former teachers which includes that of Robert L. Lepper (1987), writing in 1989 Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project as a tribute to his former teacher who leaves a copy of it with his papers in the Carnegie Mellon University faculty archives.
A short three-month sojourn to Italy in late summer of 1989 provides the artist the occasion to leave the expressionism of Buddha from the Cross (1989) and Red Ashen Skies (1989 / 2010) painting two works that restate in a more traditional manner standard Renaissance themes: the first, a baptism, later renamed Narcissus (1989 / 2007) painted in Florence in August and September and followed that October in the Sienna countryside with an Expulsion from the Garden (1989 / 1992). Both early states of these works are shown in the artist's last exhibition at Blue Mountain Gallery in New York in late December 1990 into early January 1991.
After a romantic encounter in April 1994 while visiting friends in Paris, the artist returns to France that autumn moving into a garden studio in Vincennes for ten months; there painting in a rite of exorcism the self-portrait: The Performer (1994) as counterpart to the series of single female nudes: The German Girl which owe their eroticism to the example of Egon Schiele but without the latter's explicitness. An exhibition of these paintings is shown as "La noia alemanya nua" at Galeria Magdalena Baxeras in Barcelona in December 1995 following an introduction by the Cuban photographer Herman Puig, who, having photographed Rappaport in the Vincennes studio, has invited the artist to visit Barcelona. Four of Puig's photographs of the artist sitting by his paintings are reproduced on advertisement pages in the Flash Art November/December 1995 issue and in Artforum in the November 1995, December 1995, and January 1996 issues announcing the Barcelona exhibition. These independently produced reproductions begin a new cycle of the artist's ad pages as exhibition site that run till 2003 in some thirty issues of these and other international art journals that include multiple page presentations in Bomb, Modern Painters, World Art, and Limn.
Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning: A Commemoration[edit]




1996 - Ashes in the Wind


Then continuing painting in a similar manner, the artist once back in Pittsburgh changes themes painting iconographic images of individual female figures symbolic of the victims of the Holocaust: Ashes in the Wind (1996), Madonna of the Flames (1996), Schneeloch (1996), Freeze (1996), The Chamber (1996), and Furnace Dancer (1997); and from there shifting to the motif of the skeletal figure buried in fetal position that the artist had drawn when a sophomore at Carnegie Tech and now drawn in a manner that suggests cave painting on very large canvasses washed in cadmium red in The Oven's Womb (1997).




1997 - The Oven's Womb


Then following 9/11, in the December 2001 issue of Artforum Rappaport places on an ad page a photograph from 1966 with himself standing by Ship of fools (1966) with a caption ending in "It was a time when dossiers were made on anyone who openly had concerns about our foreign policy." addressing the historical parallel with the proposed restrictions on free speech and debate as the country prepares for war.
In its September 2002 issue, Artforum prints Rappaport's letter-to-the-editor responding to Linda Nochlin's review Mirroring Evil: Nazi Imagery / Recent Art, published in the Summer 2002 issue on the exhibition of the same held at the Jewish Museum in New York.
In 2004 Rappaport begins writing his Memoir Portraits & Passages which goes on-line in late August 2005.
In February 2005 within two weeks of the 60th anniversary of the liberation of Auschwitz, Rappaport exhibits the Holocaust images from 1996 and 1997 in Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning at Garfield Artworks in Pittsburgh.




2010 - Lightning on Sinai with Artist


The artist continues this theme four years later in paintings suggesting crucifixions drawn in the manner of Michelangelo's conceptual sketches on the subject - but here the male figures are without crosses, nine feet high on washes of cadmium red in To Leap into the Arms of the Eternal (2009), and Lightning on Sinai (2010), and in the striated washes of Storm Swept (2011). Though formally iconographic, unlike the ironic detachment prevailing in Postmodern pastiche and parody, they are set at no psychological distance from the viewer and instead call for a meditative and empathetic response. Such a commemoration for the victims of Nazi hatred, stretching back forty-five years to Jewess Accused (1965), here painted with reticence and deep respect for the human being, is a parallel expression to the works addressing the disastrous consequences of barbarity as seen from the opposite side of that dark history: those of Anselm Kiefer.
Although one might wish to make a categorial statement on Rappaport's work, given its emotional undercurrent, its often painful subject-matter and expressive execution; it may be incorrect to place the whole body of work solely on the expressionist side of the Classical/Romantic divide without acknowledging that in his work as a whole there is a strong sense of formal structure and a tendency towards finding equalibrium that plays a reciprocal and balancing role to the more expressive dynamic. And this may explain its spiralling evolution; whereupon, once reaching a saturation of effect in a period of work, the artist returns to a grounding in order, simplicity, and coherence, and always with reverence for the dignity of the body and nobility of the human face.
A more complete catalogue of Rappaport's work can be found on Wikimedia Commons.
Awards and Exhibitions[edit]

1962 - Scholastic Art & Writing Awards,[2] the National Gold Medal in Drawing.
1966 - Solo Exhibition at Skibo hall, Carnegie Mellon University.
1967 - Solo Exhibition of the "Oratory Mural" at Skibo hall, Carnegie Mellon University.
1967 - Solo Exhibition at the University of Chicago - Lexington Studio Gallery, Chicago.
1968 - The Chaloner Prize,[3] as a finalist in the American Academy in Rome Prize Competition.[4]
1969 - Group exhibition, "Jeunes artistes americans" at le Centre Cultural Americaine, Paris.[5]
1970 - Solo exhibition at le Cité Internationale des Arts, Paris.[6]
1974 - 1977 Installation - "Joseph in the Pit", "Jacob in Mourning", the Joseph Papp Public Theater, New York
1974 - Solo Exhibition - South Houston Gallery, SoHo, New York.
1976 - "Carnigie Mellon/NYC Alumni Show", West Broadway Gallery, SoHo, New York.
1982 - "29 Downing Street", New York City[7]
1983, 1984, 1986, 1989, 1991 - Solo exhibitions of paintings at the Blue Mountain Gallery, SoHo, New York City.[8]
1987 - Installation of the "Oratory Mural" on extended loan to the Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential, Philadelphia.[9]
1995 - Solo exhibition - "The German Girl Nude" ("La noia alemanya nua") at Magdalena Baxeras Galleria d'Arte, Barcelona
1997 - Group exhibition "Go Figure" at the University of Rhode Island, Kingston.
2005 - "Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning", Garfield Artworks, Pittsburgh.[10]
2007 - Group exhibition, "Garden Show: In Full Bloom" Space Gallery, Pittsburgh.
2011 - "Rappaport Unblurred", International Children's Art Gallery, Pittsburgh.

References[edit]


^ "Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project". Worldcat.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "National Scholastic Art & Writing Awards". Artandwriting.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "Chaloner Prize". Siris-archives.si.edu. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "American Academy in Rome". Aarome.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ Service Americane d'information et des relations cultural, "Jeunes Artistes American", review of same, Informations & Documents, 15 October 1969: 20
^ "Le Cite Internationale des Arts". Citedesartsparis.net. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ Judd Tully, "Richard Rappaport, 29 Downing St." review of same, Flash Art International, no. 108 (Summer 1982).
^ "Blue Mountain Gallery". Blue Mountain Gallery. 2013-01-25. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "iahp.org". iahp.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "Works of Mourning, review of same, The Jewish Chronicle 3 February 2005". Pittchron.com. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Richard Rappaport.



Rappaport’s website, "Portraits & Passages," is his memoir illustrated by his works.
Article in Pittsburgh City Paper, on exhibition at International Children's Art Gallery (July 21, 2011) - Venerable painter Richard Rappaport discusses five of his works.
Article in Portuguese Wikipedia: "Pintura nos Estados Unidos", surveying painting in the United States from colonial times to the present, citing Rappaport's work along with that of two older artists as "good examples of the persistence of expressive figurative painting during its phase of ostracism and its recovery in the mid-1970s" and including reproductions of Jewess Accused (1965) and Self-Portrait (1986): "Philip Guston, Richard Rappaport e Chaim Goldberg sao bons exemplos da persistencia da pintura figurativa durante sua fase de octracismo e de sua recuperacao em meados dos anos 1970."
For a gallery of Rappaport's work on Wikimedia Commons click here. Also included is commentary about the work on the Discussion tabs.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Richard_Rappaport&oldid=786928041"					
Categories: 1944 birthsLiving peopleAmerican artists20th-century American paintersAmerican male painters21st-century American paintersAmerican printmakersCarnegie Mellon University College of Fine Arts alumniArtists from PittsburghCarnegie Mellon University alumniHidden categories: BLP articles lacking sources from May 2010All BLP articles lacking sourcesArticles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 22 June 2017, at 12:09.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Richard Rappaport - Wikipedia






















 






Richard Rappaport

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This biography of a living person needs additional citations for verification. Please help by adding reliable sources. Contentious material about living persons that is unsourced or poorly sourced must be removed immediately, especially if potentially libelous or harmful. (May 2010) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




Richard Rappaport



1994 - The German Girl - Nos. 1 and 2



Born
1944 (age 72–73)
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania


Nationality
American


Education
Carnegie Mellon University, Brooklyn College


Known for
Painting


Richard Rappaport (born 1944 in Pittsburgh) is a classically trained painter of portraits and large-scale figurative works whose pictorial evolution has spiraled towards and away from the Renaissance ideal for half a century.
In his work, even when taking the image to abstraction, Rappaport keeps the iconic figure as primal source. Besides portraits of psychological depth, Rappaport, in the tradition of painting as an act of remembrance, borrows Christian iconography to represent the Holocaust, the Nigerian Civil War, and the war in Vietnam.
A former student and friend of Robert L. Lepper at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh, PA, Rappaport is one of the artists influenced by Lepper’s course “Individual and Social Analysis”. His 1989 paper “Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project”[1] is the principal source on Lepper’s influence on Andy Warhol, Philip Pearlstein, Mel Bochner, and Jonathan Borofsky when they were Lepper’s students.
Since 1981 Rappaport’s use of the advertisement pages of international art magazines as a place of exhibition has been his principal form of public presence. This includes issues of Art in America, Artforum, Flash Art, Bomb, Modern Painters, World Art, The New Criterion, and Limn.



Contents


1 Life and work

1.1 The "Carnegie Tech" Years: Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search
1.2 Ship of Fools, July 1966
1.3 The Paris Years: Iconic Abstractions, Joseph Accused
1.4 The New York Years, Portraits in Grattage, The Public Theatre Hangings
1.5 The Return to Pittsburgh, A Visit to Paris: The German Girl
1.6 Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning: A Commemoration


2 Awards and Exhibitions
3 References
4 External links



Life and work[edit]
From early on Rappaport showed unusual promise in drawing the human face making emotionally credible portraits of family and friends from his eighth year on of which the culminating work is the reverential drawing of his great-grandmother (1954) made soon after his tenth birthday. Then for three years, starting in fifth grade, the young artist attends the Carnegie Institute's (now The Carnegie) Tam O'Shanter art class which is followed at thirteen by a year of Saturday afternoons in traditional apprenticeship in painting with the realist/surrealist artist Abe Weiner. Already an accomplished draftsman at seventeen, Rappaport is awarded the gold medal in drawing in the National Scholastic Art & Writing Awards in the spring of 1962 before entering the Department of Painting & Design at Carnegie Institute of Technology (now Carnegie Mellon University) in Pittsburgh that autumn the same time his older brother Robert Rappaport, who would become the television art director of the Mike Douglas Show and the Miss Universe Pagent, enters the Drama Department in stage design.
The "Carnegie Tech" Years: Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search[edit]
One of the most significant works that will inform this artist's future practice, made while on Christmas vacation his first year at "Carnegie Tech", is the four foot high Self Nude (scratchboard) (1962) of himself waist-high, highlighting a bare arm, shoulder and half-face against the black background. It proves to be a watershed when eight years later the artist returns to the concept of scratchboard by adapting it to layers of oil paint on canvas in "grattage" works such as Joseph Accused (1971) in which the image is made by scratching through the smoothed, palette-knife applied top layer of cadmium red to the lighter mid-color of turquoise and yellow-white base.
In August 1963, the summer following his freshman year, Rappaport paints his first suite of mature portraits, which include those of Mrs. Ress (1963), Ann Weiner (1963), and the standing three-quarter length Self Nude (1963), whose straight-on depictions of character relate to the portraits of Alice Neel, whom the artist is unaware of at the time, winning for himself the art department's Leisser Award for work done independently and affording him the occasion of his first exhibition of these portraits lining its central hallway at the beginning of his sophomore year. His father, on seeing the show, gives him an account for art supplies which makes possible his painting large works on linen canvas for his remaining three years at school.




1964 - Burial of Christ - detail


From then on he is only nominally a student; choosing his themes independently and working outside of the classroom that sophomore year with his sights on Rembrant and Titian while painting the first state of his mother's portrait Woman with Red Hands (1963) and Burial of Christ (1964) whose stark representation, an homage to the medieval Villeneuve-les-Avignons Pieta, is the first of a number of works made over the years where he portrays himself in the role of the alienated outsider.




1965 - Family Portrait-detail


These are followed in his junior year by the double-portrait of the actors Michael Tucker and Laurie Jefferson (1965) and his own partial Family Portrait (1965) that portrays only his mother, younger brother Ronald and himself during the highly emotional period when his parents have separated. Executed on rabbit-skin glue sized but not primed linen canvas, the faces in both paintings are built up from the absorbent weave that owe much to the example of Edgar Degas - especially that of the artist's mother to Degas' Portrait of a Young Woman (1867).
That summer of 1965, in Six Characters in Search (1965), the artist paints himself as rebellious protagonist/target of ridecule and prosecutor of judgment that takes its cue from Michelangelo's Christ in the Last Judgment; and senior year Jewess Accused (1965) which shifts emphasis in the story of "Christ and the Woman Taken in Adultery" to express the ostracism and accusation of crimes levied against the Jews that lead to the Holocaust. This is followed in his last semester by We Are All Somnambulists (1966). All of which are painted from live models.




1965 - Six Characters in Search






1965 - Jewess Accused


However, Rappaport's work is out of phase with the dominant art movements emerging in the sixties: Pop Art, Minimalism, and Conceptualism, and at odds with New Realism whose program of objectivity in representing the human figure by eliminating all subjective response implying the spiritual dimension discredits the overt Romanticism in Rappaport's painting. Only Alice Neel and Larry Rivers in New York, Francis Bacon and Lucian Freud in England, and Balthus in France are privileged to paint figuratively with any response to an inner life given their subjects or any implied narrative. Consequently, Rappaport's practice is marginalized already as a student, and in these early works expressing universal themes of the human condition his painting takes on an autobiographical aspect.
Apart from painting, Rappaport is constantly drawing. His most evolved graphic series he does his sophomore year in a series of drawings, lithographs, and etchings executed directly from a theatrically lit display case at the Carnegie Museum of a naturally mumified skeletal figure buried in fetal position, which was already a fascination for the artist when a fifth grader at the museum's Tam-O'Shanter classes and to which, used as a symbolic motif of the Holocaust, the artist will return thirty-five years later in painting The Oven's Womb (1997), 119"x145", drawn in a simplified manner, as if cave painting, on a color field of cadmium red.
In the ground floor sculpture studios Rappaport regularly sees Jonathan Borofsky, who is a sculpture major two years ahead of him, and during his sophomore year becomes better acquainted with Mel Bochner, who having graduated five years before has returned to Pittsburgh for the year. As both come from the same neighborhood, Rappaport gives the older artist rides in the evenings to the campus where they work in the print room and from which Bochner often visits Robert L. Lepper in his studio just down the hallway and on returning shares his enthusiasm for Lepper's speculative conversations on art practice.
In the autumn of 1964, that following year, Rappaport takes Lepper's The Oakland Project and Retrospective classes, entitled "Individual and Social Analysis", and soon forms a close bond with the older man. However, while Rappaport is fascinated by Lepper's logic and eloquence on a broad range of perceptual and communicative issues; his direction cannot be categorized with that of Lepper's famous former students: Andy Warhol, Philip Pearlatein, Mel Bochner, and Jonathan Borofsky, who, made conscious of changing hierarchies of value due to the impact of the machine and media on society, are directly influenced by Lepper's work in industrial design and Bauhaus leanings addressing the potential of technology's role in contemporary art practice, which, along with Lepper's conceptual paradigm: communication as intention expressed and followed logically, leads to making art the focus for following human reason engaged in the perception of its own awareness - a strategy seen in Bochner's Conceptual practice.
Rappaport, as much as he remains devoted to Lepper for the next twenty-five years, and all the while following the progression of Lepper's ideas in the evolution of the above-mentioned artists' work, consequently leading to his writing in 1989 "Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project", cannot be considered in Lepper's "camp". (This will be made more evident some seventeen years after Lepper's death in his essay Robert Lepper / Six Characters in Search that reviews Lepper's legacy four decades later.)
Instead, Rappaport keeps to his own agenda, already evident in the Burial of Christ painted the year before meeting Lepper, which merges in expressive figurative painting the autobiographical with the socio-political, which are options in artistic direction laid out in Lepper's introduction to his classes, and exemplify the expressive force in what Lepper is pointing to in The Retrospective, whose primary goal, bracketed-off from the socio-political, evokes the emotive, psychic power of unmediated memory in response to autobiographical material.
Most importantly, Rappaport's departure in the late 1960s from traditional brush painting to his employing grattage technique does owe a debt to Lepper's own example of arriving at the conclusion that the paintbrush was not his tool but those of the industrial fabricator were. And in looking back to the great figurative tradition of western art as a resource and inspiration, Rappaport is doing so informed by Lepper's late-modernist/postmodernist perspective and his injunction to allow for the unexpected by letting the process suggest where the work should go and not rush to expectations that set limitations on expression.
The autumn of 1964 proves to be an auspicious time when soon after beginning Robert Lepper's class, Rappaport meets Herbert A. Simon, one of the most influential social scientists of the 20th century, whose computer simulated pioneer work in decision making parallels the communicative functions in Lepper's conceptual strategies, and following Rappaport's gift of a lithograph drawing of Simon's daughter Barbara, which initiates their acquaintance, Simon becomes an early supporter and longtime friend of the young artist, and whose portrait Herbert A Simon (1987) Rappaport paints in the summer of 1987 for Carnegie Mellon University as its first Nobel Prize laureate on the faculty and which is followed a week later by Lepper's portrait.
Ship of Fools, July 1966[edit]




Ship of Fools by Richard Rappaport, 1966


Upon graduation in June 1966, Rappaport is offered a loft space on West 74th Street, New York for the summer where he paints his first work that is no longer dependent on live models but instead employs an expressively gestural execution in drawing the figures with large areas of washed-on color. Taking a cue from a photograph of Chagall painting his murals for Lincoln Center on the floor, as well as Japanese scroll painting in a book left by his benefactor which includes an image of a typhoon swept boat in the Mongol armada's failed invasion of Japan in the sixteenth century, Rappaport, with Hieronymus Bosch's version already in mind for its subject, begins painting Ship of Fools (1966) within hours of the announcement of the United States first bombing raids into North Vietnam escalating the war.
Ship of Fools not only marks a major historical event; artistically it marks a turning point from which the twenty-one-year-old artist enters into the beginning phase of a four-year evolution towards an iconographic figuration that in some works of 1970 comes close to reducing traces of the figurative element almost entirely.




1966 - Oratory Mural detail - the Annunciation


Rappaport's next major work in that evolution, the Oratory Mural (1966-1967), comes as a result of exhibiting Ship of Fools at Skibo Hall at Carnegie Mellon University in November 1966 when Father Philip Walsh of the Pittsburgh Oratory commissions Rappaport to paint a triptych for their proposed retreat house and arranges for the artist a studio space in the former chancellery behind St. Paul's Cathedral in Pittsburgh where the artist paints the canvasses on the floor in its Gothic library. The mural, declined, remains rolled for twenty years; whereupon, through the auspices of Michael A. Roosevelt, it finds a home on extended loan to the Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential, Philadelphia in 1987.




1967 - Oratory Mural Escape Through the Desert


In working out the iconography on this fourteen by twenty-five foot triptych, the artist becomes an admirer of the frescoes of Giotto; though only the "Escape through the Desert" on the left canvas of the Oratory Mural suggests openly that influence. And in general, in spite of the seriousness of the subject in Giotto's cycle on 'The Life of Christ" in the Scrovegni Chapel, there is a playfulness in the pantomime that informs its celebratory mood that Rappaport responds to in his mural and that is expressed in the decorative, modernist function of the gessoed patterns playing in tandem with the figurative representation.
On a structural level, it is in works a few years later, however hidden his example, where Giotto's condensed compositions within the square that collapse the architectural space, or as in the cycle on St. Francis in Assisi, the mountainous canyons in which his figures find themselves, that becomes a source of inspiration for Rappaport's more abstracted figurative works contained in shallow relief as in Valley of the Kings (1969) and Asleep by the Tomb (1970).
Giotto, however, is not alone as an iconographic source for the mural. In Robert Campin's Annunciation (1427-1432), the round table that discreetly separates the angel Gabriel from Mary becomes for Rappaport's image the "circle of acceptance" upon which Mary is about to place her hand, and where Rappaport adds above her head the face of another angel representing her consciousness of her son's future looking upwards to the Baptism, and from which evolves several years later into the surreal and abstracted motif of "courtship" in Providence in Motion (1969).
While working on the Oratory Mural, the artist having graduated, nonetheless, is given for a short time the privileged use of the print room at Carnegie Tech. Transcribing onto a large deeply bit etching plate a linear adaptation of his mother's portrait Woman with Red Hands (1963-1966), the artist fashions a severe icon of his mother which when combined with the motif in the etching of Evelyn Ress, with the double view of her head one dropping below the other as she falls asleep, becomes the prototype for a series of paintings that start with Mourning Clown (1967), that expresses the artist's sorrow over the death of his good friend Mrs. Ress, and The Work of Mourning (1968), that turns to the greater theme of the Holocaust, and which make a seamless progression into the works that evolve in France in the autumn of 1968.
The Paris Years: Iconic Abstractions, Joseph Accused[edit]
In September 1968, upon being awarded the Chaloner Prize through the Rome Prize competition, Rappaport begins what would be an almost three-year sojourn in France; first living in Vincennes and the following year, through the auspices of Darthea Speyer, the American-in-Paris gallerist, is awarded a residency at the Cite Internationale des Arts.




1968 - Father, Vulture, Holy Butterfly


Although Picasso's Weeping Woman is suggested in these works in Paris, as is Tutankhamun's gilded face mask and Rouault's The King, in Biafran Madonna 1st ver. (1968) and Rabbi (1968), along with the formal structure in the Romanesque altarpieces of Cimabue in Father, Vulture, Holy Butterfly (1968), and the paint-encrusted shield-like shapes of Oceanic effigies in Death Has No Master (1970); it is his own etchings, and above all, the etching process itself: from rolling a coating of wax onto the plate's surface - to drawing into that wax ground - to scraping away unwanted lines after the plate is bit in the acid bath that leads Rappaport to the way he will soon execute in paint in a two-stage process the works of 1969 and 1970 that are shaped by scraping away the multiple layers of paint applied in the initial stage of the image both when malleable and once dry to form reductively the final image - a process to which the artist gives the general term "in grattage". As such, the tactile, almost violent manner, in the acknowledgment of process and material in forming these primitive/modernist figurative icons which are as much carved and sculpted as painted and the resulting symbolism that explores the devastation of time upon man's endeavors or portrays malevolence against the innocent anticipates Neo-Expressionism and relates to the work of Anselm Kiefer.




1971 - Joseph Accused-detail


Two years later in the autumn of 1970, while his solo exhibition of the more recent of these "iconic abstractions" is hanging at the Cite des Arts, Rappaport, upon reading Thomas Mann's "Joseph and His Brothers", begins Joseph Accused (1970-1971) followed by Joseph in the Pit (1971) and Jacob in Mourning (1971) which are made in a scratchboard-like technique in which the drawn image is scratched through the dry surface layer of cadmium red into the base layers of turquoise and yellow-white on the canvas - a method to which the artist also gives the term "grattage", and which its effect in Joseph Accused suggests ancient Egyptian temple wall reliefs precisely cut into red granite in which the figures are styled as a consequence in shallow space, deliberately flattened and silhouetted by overstated contours.
The ritualized gesture of Joseph's arms extending downwards, as if bound together to two open hands, a sign of supplication and innocence, is a studied and mimetic quotation. This combined with the addition of the second arm and hand is an obvious restructuring of the desperately outstretched arm and hand of the man being strangled in Max Beckmann's Die Nacht, which Rapport sees as a symbolic precursor to "Kristallnacht", the Nazi "Night of Broken Glass", the night of terror perpetrated on the Jewish community on November 7, 1938, generally considered marking the beginning of the Holocaust. Consequently, Rapport considers his representation of the Biblical story of Joseph Accused, with its formalistic and iconographic pictorial dependency on the art of Max Beckmann, as an iconographic statement for modern history to the horrific anti-Semitism in Nazi Germany and a testimony to the theme 'stranger in a strange land' in Thomas Mann's four book epic honoring the ancient Hebraic spiritual quest.
The New York Years, Portraits in Grattage, The Public Theatre Hangings[edit]
Throughout most of the 1970s, while simultaneously painting works that have evolved from the iconic abstractions of Paris, Rappaport makes over twenty portraits in grattage beginning with the double portrait of Jake and Esther Schwartz (1971) in Philadelphia while staying at his brother's on his return from France in the summer of 1971 for the sculptor Barbara Schwartz, the model for Potiphar's Wife in Joseph Accused; then once in New York, Luke (1973) that will be shown along with works by Warhol and Philip Pearlstein in New York City / Carnegie Mellon Alumni exhibition at Westbroadway Gallery in 1976, the tapestry-like devotional icon of the guru Baba Muktananda (1976-1977), and its technical twin: The White Sisters (1976-1979), that evolves through several metamorphosis, then finally scraped-down to a bare tint of color on the canvas threads leaving only the lyrical contours as an Art Nouveau tableau, finished just months before the artist's return to traditional brush painting with The Barren Womb (1979).




1972 - Jack & Richard - Detail


But before his New York period begins, the artist is stricken and operated for pericarditis in the spring of 1972, spending most of the summer at his brother's in Philadelphia convalescing before needing a second operation in early September. Then two theatre friends of his brother's from the Carnegie Tech Drama Department invite the artist to New York by commissioning their portraits in grattage. The first, the double portrait of Jack & Richard (1972) of the stage designer Jack Doepp and aspiring opera singer Richard Magpion is made during the artist's stay at Jack's studio on West 85th Street for the remainder of the year and owes the decorative aspect and theatrical staging of the two figures emerging from the densely luminous red surface to Gustav Klimt's gilded paintings. The portrait, nonetheless, is declined and five years later in 1977 is purchased by Pamela Newhouse. The second, the more sober portrait of Dean Brown (1973), is finished that spring when the artist moves to East Seventh Street in the East Village, Manhattan.




1971 - Jacob in Mourning


In 1974, at the home of Conde Nast publisher S.I. Newhouse Jr., Rappaport is introduced to Joseph Papp, the founding director of the New York Public Theatre, who offers to hang the nine feet high Joseph in the Pit and Jacob in Mourning in the Public Theatre's inner-lobby. They are installed that autumn of 1974 and remain there till the autumn of 1977.
Soon after their return the artist reworks Joseph in the Pit painting Joseph's hand red to stand for the painting of blood on the doorposts as a sign to warn away the Angel of Death in the Passover story of "Exodus", compounding it with the original story in "Genesis", and adding the huge face of a female apparition, suggesting that angel, drawn from the portrait Catherine Kirkwood (1977), that, with the artist being the model for Joseph, adds an autobiographical layer to this episode of Joseph's struggle with self-doubt that prefigures the story of Jesus in the New Testament's "Christ on the Mount of Olives". In this, Rappaport follows the Western art practice of the continuous narrative - the layering of stories separated by centuries while alluding to stories further into the future.
Attacked late at night by a knifer while walking through Tompkins Square in the East Village in early 1978, Rappaport, shaken by the incident and discouraged after his paintings are taken down at the Public Theatre, abandons his apartment on East Seventh Street and spends more than several months in Washington, D.C. before moving to Brooklyn in 1979 when he enters the masters program at Brooklyn College with the thought of eventually teaching, earning his M.F.A. in 1981.
Given a portion of his modest inheritance when his father is stricken by a major heart attack, Rappaport begins in the December 1981 issue of Art in America his first suite of multiple ad pages that continue in the following issues through April 1982. Coinciding with that last issue in April, Rappaport stages an exhibit in a carriage-house studio at 29 Downing Street in the West Village (NYC), of seven current paintings including The Abode (1981) and White Madonna (1981) attracting Judd Tully, who intrigued by Rappaport's independent media campaign, includes mention of it in his review for that summer's issue of Flash Art International.
Two years later Rappaport joins the cooperative Blue Mountain Gallery in New York where he has five solo exhibitions through 1991.
The Return to Pittsburgh, A Visit to Paris: The German Girl[edit]
In 1985 he returns to Pittsburgh. Then after a series of seven self-portraits made in the summer of 1986, a number of which are shown with Blue Madonna (1986) at Blue Mountain Gallery towards the end of that year; that following summer, upon being commissioned by Herbert Simon to paint his official portrait for Carnegie Mellon University, the artist also begins a series of elders and former teachers which includes that of Robert L. Lepper (1987), writing in 1989 Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project as a tribute to his former teacher who leaves a copy of it with his papers in the Carnegie Mellon University faculty archives.
A short three-month sojourn to Italy in late summer of 1989 provides the artist the occasion to leave the expressionism of Buddha from the Cross (1989) and Red Ashen Skies (1989 / 2010) painting two works that restate in a more traditional manner standard Renaissance themes: the first, a baptism, later renamed Narcissus (1989 / 2007) painted in Florence in August and September and followed that October in the Sienna countryside with an Expulsion from the Garden (1989 / 1992). Both early states of these works are shown in the artist's last exhibition at Blue Mountain Gallery in New York in late December 1990 into early January 1991.
After a romantic encounter in April 1994 while visiting friends in Paris, the artist returns to France that autumn moving into a garden studio in Vincennes for ten months; there painting in a rite of exorcism the self-portrait: The Performer (1994) as counterpart to the series of single female nudes: The German Girl which owe their eroticism to the example of Egon Schiele but without the latter's explicitness. An exhibition of these paintings is shown as "La noia alemanya nua" at Galeria Magdalena Baxeras in Barcelona in December 1995 following an introduction by the Cuban photographer Herman Puig, who, having photographed Rappaport in the Vincennes studio, has invited the artist to visit Barcelona. Four of Puig's photographs of the artist sitting by his paintings are reproduced on advertisement pages in the Flash Art November/December 1995 issue and in Artforum in the November 1995, December 1995, and January 1996 issues announcing the Barcelona exhibition. These independently produced reproductions begin a new cycle of the artist's ad pages as exhibition site that run till 2003 in some thirty issues of these and other international art journals that include multiple page presentations in Bomb, Modern Painters, World Art, and Limn.
Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning: A Commemoration[edit]




1996 - Ashes in the Wind


Then continuing painting in a similar manner, the artist once back in Pittsburgh changes themes painting iconographic images of individual female figures symbolic of the victims of the Holocaust: Ashes in the Wind (1996), Madonna of the Flames (1996), Schneeloch (1996), Freeze (1996), The Chamber (1996), and Furnace Dancer (1997); and from there shifting to the motif of the skeletal figure buried in fetal position that the artist had drawn when a sophomore at Carnegie Tech and now drawn in a manner that suggests cave painting on very large canvasses washed in cadmium red in The Oven's Womb (1997).




1997 - The Oven's Womb


Then following 9/11, in the December 2001 issue of Artforum Rappaport places on an ad page a photograph from 1966 with himself standing by Ship of fools (1966) with a caption ending in "It was a time when dossiers were made on anyone who openly had concerns about our foreign policy." addressing the historical parallel with the proposed restrictions on free speech and debate as the country prepares for war.
In its September 2002 issue, Artforum prints Rappaport's letter-to-the-editor responding to Linda Nochlin's review Mirroring Evil: Nazi Imagery / Recent Art, published in the Summer 2002 issue on the exhibition of the same held at the Jewish Museum in New York.
In 2004 Rappaport begins writing his Memoir Portraits & Passages which goes on-line in late August 2005.
In February 2005 within two weeks of the 60th anniversary of the liberation of Auschwitz, Rappaport exhibits the Holocaust images from 1996 and 1997 in Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning at Garfield Artworks in Pittsburgh.




2010 - Lightning on Sinai with Artist


The artist continues this theme four years later in paintings suggesting crucifixions drawn in the manner of Michelangelo's conceptual sketches on the subject - but here the male figures are without crosses, nine feet high on washes of cadmium red in To Leap into the Arms of the Eternal (2009), and Lightning on Sinai (2010), and in the striated washes of Storm Swept (2011). Though formally iconographic, unlike the ironic detachment prevailing in Postmodern pastiche and parody, they are set at no psychological distance from the viewer and instead call for a meditative and empathetic response. Such a commemoration for the victims of Nazi hatred, stretching back forty-five years to Jewess Accused (1965), here painted with reticence and deep respect for the human being, is a parallel expression to the works addressing the disastrous consequences of barbarity as seen from the opposite side of that dark history: those of Anselm Kiefer.
Although one might wish to make a categorial statement on Rappaport's work, given its emotional undercurrent, its often painful subject-matter and expressive execution; it may be incorrect to place the whole body of work solely on the expressionist side of the Classical/Romantic divide without acknowledging that in his work as a whole there is a strong sense of formal structure and a tendency towards finding equalibrium that plays a reciprocal and balancing role to the more expressive dynamic. And this may explain its spiralling evolution; whereupon, once reaching a saturation of effect in a period of work, the artist returns to a grounding in order, simplicity, and coherence, and always with reverence for the dignity of the body and nobility of the human face.
A more complete catalogue of Rappaport's work can be found on Wikimedia Commons.
Awards and Exhibitions[edit]

1962 - Scholastic Art & Writing Awards,[2] the National Gold Medal in Drawing.
1966 - Solo Exhibition at Skibo hall, Carnegie Mellon University.
1967 - Solo Exhibition of the "Oratory Mural" at Skibo hall, Carnegie Mellon University.
1967 - Solo Exhibition at the University of Chicago - Lexington Studio Gallery, Chicago.
1968 - The Chaloner Prize,[3] as a finalist in the American Academy in Rome Prize Competition.[4]
1969 - Group exhibition, "Jeunes artistes americans" at le Centre Cultural Americaine, Paris.[5]
1970 - Solo exhibition at le Cité Internationale des Arts, Paris.[6]
1974 - 1977 Installation - "Joseph in the Pit", "Jacob in Mourning", the Joseph Papp Public Theater, New York
1974 - Solo Exhibition - South Houston Gallery, SoHo, New York.
1976 - "Carnigie Mellon/NYC Alumni Show", West Broadway Gallery, SoHo, New York.
1982 - "29 Downing Street", New York City[7]
1983, 1984, 1986, 1989, 1991 - Solo exhibitions of paintings at the Blue Mountain Gallery, SoHo, New York City.[8]
1987 - Installation of the "Oratory Mural" on extended loan to the Institutes for the Achievement of Human Potential, Philadelphia.[9]
1995 - Solo exhibition - "The German Girl Nude" ("La noia alemanya nua") at Magdalena Baxeras Galleria d'Arte, Barcelona
1997 - Group exhibition "Go Figure" at the University of Rhode Island, Kingston.
2005 - "Ashes in the Wind: The Work of Mourning", Garfield Artworks, Pittsburgh.[10]
2007 - Group exhibition, "Garden Show: In Full Bloom" Space Gallery, Pittsburgh.
2011 - "Rappaport Unblurred", International Children's Art Gallery, Pittsburgh.

References[edit]


^ "Robert Lepper, Carnegie Tech, and the Oakland Project". Worldcat.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "National Scholastic Art & Writing Awards". Artandwriting.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "Chaloner Prize". Siris-archives.si.edu. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "American Academy in Rome". Aarome.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ Service Americane d'information et des relations cultural, "Jeunes Artistes American", review of same, Informations & Documents, 15 October 1969: 20
^ "Le Cite Internationale des Arts". Citedesartsparis.net. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ Judd Tully, "Richard Rappaport, 29 Downing St." review of same, Flash Art International, no. 108 (Summer 1982).
^ "Blue Mountain Gallery". Blue Mountain Gallery. 2013-01-25. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "iahp.org". iahp.org. Retrieved 2013-10-05. 
^ "Works of Mourning, review of same, The Jewish Chronicle 3 February 2005". Pittchron.com. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Richard Rappaport.



Rappaport’s website, "Portraits & Passages," is his memoir illustrated by his works.
Article in Pittsburgh City Paper, on exhibition at International Children's Art Gallery (July 21, 2011) - Venerable painter Richard Rappaport discusses five of his works.
Article in Portuguese Wikipedia: "Pintura nos Estados Unidos", surveying painting in the United States from colonial times to the present, citing Rappaport's work along with that of two older artists as "good examples of the persistence of expressive figurative painting during its phase of ostracism and its recovery in the mid-1970s" and including reproductions of Jewess Accused (1965) and Self-Portrait (1986): "Philip Guston, Richard Rappaport e Chaim Goldberg sao bons exemplos da persistencia da pintura figurativa durante sua fase de octracismo e de sua recuperacao em meados dos anos 1970."
For a gallery of Rappaport's work on Wikimedia Commons click here. Also included is commentary about the work on the Discussion tabs.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Richard_Rappaport&oldid=786928041"					
Categories: 1944 birthsLiving peopleAmerican artists20th-century American paintersAmerican male painters21st-century American paintersAmerican printmakersCarnegie Mellon University College of Fine Arts alumniArtists from PittsburghCarnegie Mellon University alumniHidden categories: BLP articles lacking sources from May 2010All BLP articles lacking sourcesArticles with hCardsPages using infobox artist with unknown parameters 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschPortuguês 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 22 June 2017, at 12:09.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






 



Richard Rappaport
















HOME
BIOGRAPHY
CONTACT ME






















biography
Contact Me


















RICHARD RAPPAPORT 
CEO & Founder @WestPark Capital | Investment Banker – Emerging Growth & Middle Markets| IPO’s & Private Placements
Richard Rappaport is Chief Executive Officer and Founder of WestPark Capital – a full-service international investment bank that specializes in taking companies public. Focusing in a myriad of sectors, such as healthcare, software, technology, biotechnology, financial services, manufacturing, consumer products, media and telecom industries, WestPark Capital is located in the United States, China, Hong Kong and Taiwan. 
Read more

With extensive experience in the small capital investment banking and securities markets, Richard has led investment departments, been responsible for public offerings, and managed corporate finance activities for over three decades. His background consists of leadership and Managing Director roles in a number of investment firms, including the likes of Global Capital Securities and Joseph Charles & Associates. Richard is also the former Chairman and current Board Member for the New Roads School and a Board Member of Skechers U.S.A., Inc.
A key career achievement for Richard and the WestPark Capital firm has been the invention of the Structured IPO “SIPO” process, through which a company recapitalizes and lists directly on an exchange in the U.S, Asia, or Europe (such as NasdaqGM, Hong Kong, TSX, LSE, etc.), by raising capital in various stages throughout the process. The SIPO consists of a Private Placement followed by an IPO, encompassing the cost effectiveness and timeliness of a Private Placement while also retaining the increased market awareness and liquidity of a Public Offering.
Richard holds an MBA from University of California Los Angeles and a degree in Business Administration from University of California Berkeley. A recipient of the Wittenberg-Livingston Fellowship, Richard is also a member of the esteemed Beta Gamma Sigma Business Honorary Society.
Specialties: With over 35 years of experience in the investment banking sector, Richard’s specialties lie in the areas of:

Investment Banking
WRASP
Corporate Finance
Financial Advisory
Middle Market Companies
Emerging Growth Companies
IPOs
Technology (Internet, Core & mobile), Media, Telecom
Biofuels, Solar, Wind
Oil, Gas, Electric Power
Life Sciences
Healthcare
Show Less

















PRIVACY POLICY
CONDITIONS OF USE
BEST EXECUTION REPORTS
AML
ITPP
BUSINESS CONTINUITY PLAN SUMMARY
WESTPARK CAPITAL LEGAL DISCLAIMER
MEMEBER FINRA/SIPC



© Richard Rappaport. All Rights Reserved

























 













 


Rappaport Richard V in New York, New York with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeNew York, NYRappaport Richard VNew York, NY Rappaport Richard VAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection1. Rappaport Richard V112 Madison AveNew York, NY 10016(212) 685-8999AttorneysWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection2. Richard V. Rappaport and Associates300 Garden City Plz Ste 218Garden City, NY 11530(631) 234-0660AttorneysGeneral Practice AttorneysWebsiteServicesAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection3. Rappaport Richard V50 Charles Lindbergh BlvdUniondale, NY 11553(212) 685-8999AttorneysLegal Service PlansAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection4. Rappaport Richard V1900 Hempstead Tpke Ste 200East Meadow, NY 11554(516) 222-8200Labor & Employment Law AttorneysWebsiteServicesBusinesses in related categories to AttorneysAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED5. The Rothenberg Law Firm LLP450 Fashion AveNew York, NY 10123(800) 624-8888Automobile Accident AttorneysAttorneysWebsiteLearn MoreDirectionsServicesMore InfoFrom Business: Defective Products, Malnutrition, Industrial Accidents, Catastrophic Injuries, Farm Accidents, Bus Accidents, Car Accidents, Environmental Law, Disability, Electr…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED6. Salem & Shimko, Esqs., LLC(1)446 Avenue PBrooklyn, NY 11223(718) 684-6600Wills, Trusts & Estate Planning...WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoI used Salem & Shimko for my uncontested divorce filing last month.  They are friendly, knowledgable, and always willing to go the extra mile for th…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED7. Mark E. Cohen Bankruptcy Law Firm10818 Queens Blvd Ste 10818Forest Hills, NY 11375(877) 556-2286Bankruptcy Law AttorneysAttorneysWebsiteLearn MoreDirectionsMore InfoMake an AppointmentFrom Business: In December 1991, Queens County bankruptcy lawyer Mark E. Cohen represented his first client in a Chapter 7 bankruptcy. Since then, Queens County bankruptcy lawye…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED8. Richardson Legal PLLC(6)BBB Rating: A+3108 Broadway Suite 204Astoria, NY 11106(718) 717-2380Divorce AttorneysDivorce AssistanceWebsiteDirectionsServicesMore InfoI was very pleased with Richardson Legal. They actually show genuine concern about their clients and not just taking your money. I had gone to a law…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection9. Pasternack Tilker Ziegler Walsh233 BroadwayNew York, NY 10279(877) 464-4704Employee Benefits & Worker...WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: Have you been injured at work? Call now to speak with an experienced workers compensation attorney for a free case review.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection10. Irving Cohen Attorney at Law233 Broadway Rm 2701New York, NY 10279(877) 865-9063AttorneysCriminal Law AttorneysWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: We at Irving Cohen Attorney at Law, specialize Drug Crime Law, Criminal Law, and Civil Rights Law in the New York, NY area. Call us today to schedule your appoint…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection11. Rutkin & Wolf, PLLC575 Madison AveNew York, NY 10022(877) 892-5966AttorneysBusiness Law AttorneysWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: Welcome to Rutkin & Wolf, PLLC, experienced and reliable representation. No matter how much one may hope otherwise, sometimes life can take an unexpected turn tha…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection12. The Law Office of David Schnall404 E 55th StNew York, NY 10022(877) 214-0613Divorce AttorneysAttorneysWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: Call now to speak with an experienced divorce and family law attorney.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection13. Personal Injury PlaceServing the New York Area.(877) 292-1730AttorneysPersonal Injury Law AttorneysWebsiteMore InfoFrom Business: Free personal injury case evaluation + Free case review by a local attorney+ Find out if you can get compensation for your injury+ 100% confidential and no obliga…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection14. The Tax Resolvers©Serving the New York Area.(866) 779-3904AttorneysTax AttorneysWebsiteMore InfoFrom Business: The Tax Resolvers © solves tax problems!We specialize in working directly with the IRS to resolve back taxes and the problems associated. We can negotiate tax lie…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection15. Levine & Blit, LLP(1)Serving the New York Area.(866) 271-3810Labor & Employment Law AttorneysWebsiteMore InfoAfter a free consultation I was lucky enough to get Mr. Moriarty as my lawyer. Russell worked hard to protect my rights and went beyond what he need…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection16. Injury HelpLine®Serving the New York Area.(888) 278-0637AttorneysWebsiteMore InfoFrom Business: Categories: Personal Injury, Auto Accident Attorney and other Vehicle Accident General Info Get connected to a local attorney for free. If you have been injured i…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection17. AAA Tax ReliefServing the New York Area.(877) 540-2856AttorneysWebsiteMore InfoFrom Business: We are a full service tax resolution firm. Call today and speak with a friendly tax analyst.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection18. eLocal LawyersServing the New York Area.(877) 328-4617AttorneysWrongful Death AttorneysWebsiteMore InfoFrom Business: Have you or a loved one been injured in an accident? Call now for a free injury case review. There are no fees unless we win your case.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection19. National Tax DebtServing the New York Area.(866) 404-1618Taxes-Consultants & RepresentativesWebsiteMore InfoFrom Business: Helping you settle your back taxes with the IRS.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED20. EverLatching LoveNew York, NY 10038(646) 582-9197Hospital & Nursing Home ConsultantsMore InfoAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED21. Joseph A Ledwidge P.C. Attorney At Law17026 Cedarcroft RdJamaica, NY 11432(855) 353-7720AttorneysLegal Service PlansWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsVideoServicesMore InfoVisit our websitenyqueenslaw.comFrom Business: Joseph A. Ledwidge, P.C., provides clients with the support and guidance they need in the often complicated and emotional aspects of probate, litigation, divorce …Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED22. Law Office of Stuart DiMartini1325 Avenue Of The AmericasNew York, NY 10019(347) 378-3962AttorneysTransportation Law AttorneysWebsiteCouponsSubmit FormDirectionsMore InfoFree ConsultationFrom Business: Stuart DiMartini is a personal injury lawyer who has been protecting and asserting the rights of the seriously injured since 1987. With offices in New York and in…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED23. Isaacson, Schiowitz & Korson, LLP(2)5 Penn PlzNew York, NY 10001(866) 711-1968Personal Injury Law AttorneysWebsiteDirectionsMore InfoI highly recommend this firm.  They are very professional and were able to get me top dollar on my case.Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection24. The Sachs Firm(1)1133 Broadway Ste 706New York, NY 10010(631) 629-4310AttorneysPersonal Injury Law AttorneysWebsiteDirectionsServicesMore InfoI received a very large settlement for my neck and back case.  I was very pleased with Brian's work on my case and he was always responsive and kept…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collectionPREFERRED25. Phillips & Associates Attorneys at Law, PLLC(9)45 Broadway Ste 620New York, NY 10006(646) 808-0314Labor & Employment Law AttorneysWebsiteCouponsVirtual TourDirectionsMore InfoFree ConsutlationI didn't know anything about the law, but Casey took me through it and advised me what was best.  I appreciate the time he took.  What he said he wa…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection26. DeSena & Associates LLP(1)225 BroadwayNew York, NY 10007(212) 233-7744AttorneysPersonal Injury Law AttorneysWebsiteCouponsDirectionsFREE CONSULTATIONS!Ralph DeSena is an excellent and experienced attorney. His enthusiasm to help accident victims was apparent throughout the case. Put your case in hi…Add to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your services collection!Error when adding to services collectionThis business was removed from the services collection27. R. Williams, P.C.11 Broadway Ste 615New York, NY 10004(347) 691-8193AttorneysBusiness Law AttorneysWebsiteContact UsDirectionsMore InfoFrom Business: RUSSELL WILLIAMS the firm's principal, has been admitted to the New York Bar since 1988 and the Florida Bar Since 1995. He was also a practicing solicitor in Lond…Sponsored LinksRelated Articlesfor Rappaport Richard Vmore related articles »When to Call a Lawyer vs. a Mediator »As in a court case, the process of mediation provides a method of conflict resolution. However, it is much more informal and does …What Type of Injuries Can a Personal Injury Lawyer Help with »A personal injury lawyer can help defendants in a variety of situations, from car accidents to defamation. Learn what personal inj…How to Work with Divorce Lawyers & Avoid Financial Mistakes »Divorce lawyers help couples agree to the terms of their separation, but can also be very expensive. Learn how to choose the right…Map ViewSponsoredHeld, Held & Held Attorneys At Law6920 Bay Pkwy, Brooklyn, NY 11204(718) 236-2323WebsiteView TestimonialsDirectionsVideoMore InfoTips & AdviceHow should I choose a lawyer?When it comes time to choose a lawyer, you should start by searching close to home. If you do have attorneys you are familiar with, ask who they believe would be best for you. After going through personal references - especially from individuals who had similar needs - you should broaden your search through public information resources. You can call your area's attorney referral service or check legal organizations like Martindale-Hubbell. There are other resources available online, such as yellowpages.com. You can check websites for client reviews and other third-party forms of approval.Why should I hire a lawyer?If you sign documents and you come across a word you don't recognize, or you need help to navigate important employment or real estate paperwork. Also, during times when personal matters intersect with legal proceedings, you might need to have an advocate to prevent your emotions from getting in the way. If you've been accused of a crime or are in a terrible financial situation, you can find an attorney who will work with what you have available.What can I have an attorney do for me?When you hire a lawyer, you're agreeing to work with someone over a certain period of time. The more forthcoming the lawyer appears to be with individual needs, the better.

You need to ask questions about how the attorney will communicate with you and what responsibilities you hold in the relationship.
The attorney should let you know the best channel for quick communication and you need to inform him or her when you want updates.
You should also ask questions to get to know the attorney as an individual in order to ensure this is a person you can trust. Ask about their legal philosophy and how he or she views the lawyer/client relationship. Ask as how to keep fees down or what daily disruptions you should expect from a long legal battle.
How much will an attorney cost?You need to ask about every possible fee that will come up when working with an attorney. You should request a list of all costs in advance so you won't be surprised by additional expenses like overhead. Also determine exactly when you will start being billed. You want to inspect paperwork carefully. If the attorney charges you for his or her experience, you need to make sure he or she will perform tasks personally and not hand it off to an assistant. Find out if the attorney has a flat fee or charges by the hour. Many civil lawyers work on contingency. Make inquiries about how the lawyer plans to provide service for your money and what you can do if you start to feel unsatisfied with his or her performance.Can I ask an attorney about past cases they worked on?You can ask how many similar cases they have handled and if they have special skills or training that applies specifically to your needs. Lawyers can't mention clients by name, but you should ask for basic details about identical past cases. You should check their office for the appropriate certifications and diplomas. You can also ask how long he or she has practiced law and request information that demonstrates the practice's success. Look for precise details such as percentage of cases settled out of court.What does a family lawyer do?Family attorneys deal with personal matters. If you're getting married, a family lawyer can help you prepare a prenuptial agreement or other family planning paperwork, such as adoption or inheritance documents.What does a divorce attorney do?Most people will turn to a lawyer during a divorce to navigate the emotionally charged legal proceedings. A divorce attorney can assist in determining grounds for separation, division of property and custody of children.What does a personal injury lawyer do?When you're hurt by an outside party, and you would like to hold them legally responsible, a personal injury attorney conducts litigation and negotiates settlements to compensate for your pain and suffering. Sometimes many wronged people will join with a single civil lawyer or law office to form a class action lawsuit.What does a civil attorney do?If you are suing someone or being sued, you need a civil lawyer. Civil attorneys argue on your behalf in a courtroom setting. Civil lawyers may represent you on matters of business, finance or a wide variety of other specialized needs.What does a bankruptcy lawyer do?A bankruptcy lawyer can help create strategies to bring you out of debt and speak to your creditors. A lawyer can advise you on which type of bankruptcy you should file for.See more Tips & AdviceDavid T Azrin, Esq845 3rd Ave, New York, NY 10022(212) 935-3131WebsiteContact UsDirectionsMore InfoPhillips & Associates Attorneys at Law, PLLC(9)45 Broadway Ste 620, New York, NY 10006(646) 808-0314No Fees Unless We RecoverWebsiteCouponsContact UsVirtual TourDirectionsMore InfoThe Mandel Law Firm370 Lexington Ave Rm 505, New York, NY 10017(917) 512-4343Family-Personal Injury-Malpractice AttorneysWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsMore InfoLaw Office of Patricia Machado P.C.560 W 180th St Ste 302, New York, NY 10033(646) 604-9463WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoThe Mandel Law Firm370 Lexington Ave Rm 505, New York, NY 10017(917) 675-4027Family-Personal Injury-Malpractice AttorneysWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsMore InfoR. Williams, P.C.11 Broadway Ste 615, New York, NY 10004(347) 691-8193Your local Business LawyerWebsiteContact UsDirectionsMore InfoTimothy S. Hart, Tax Attorney and CPA(5)1180 Avenue Of The Americas Fl 8, New York, NY 10036(917) 382-5142Tax Attorney and CPA,WebsiteContact UsDirectionsMore InfoLaw Office of Stuart DiMartini1325 Avenue Of The Americas, New York, NY 10019(347) 378-3962PI Law is all we do! We Know how to get Results!WebsiteCouponsSubmit FormDirectionsMore InfoGreenberg Law Firm(3)86 Court St, Brooklyn, NY 11201(347) 834-8150State & Federal Criminal - Immigration - AppealsWebsiteSee Our ServicesDirectionsMore InfoKlee & Woolf LLP26 Court St, Brooklyn, NY 11242(718) 229-9002WebsiteDirectionsMore InfoWarren & Warren P.C.185 Montague St, Brooklyn, NY 11201(718) 855-7000WebsiteLearn MoreDirectionsMore InfoNathan Erlich P. C. Attorney at Law10818 Queens Blvd, Forest Hills, NY 11375(646) 918-1410Ask Me How to Save on Mortgage and Transfer Taxes?WebsiteSchedule ConsultationDirectionsMore InfoLaw Office of Monica Saran- Nace, P.C.(15)30 31st St, Astoria, NY 11102(347) 536-5217Experienced Lawyer Represents in Waivers for Unlawful Presence I-601WebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsMore InfoJoseph A Ledwidge P.C. Attorney At Law17026 Cedarcroft Rd, Jamaica, NY 11432(855) 353-7720We Act Promptly To Help Speed Up Your DivorceWebsiteServices OfferedDirectionsVideoMore InfoJonathan D'Agostino & Associates, P.C.(4)3309 Richmond Ave, Staten Island, NY 10312(347) 706-4561The Injury FirmWebsiteContact UsDirectionsVideoMore InfoHeld, Held & Held Attorneys At Law6920 Bay Pkwy, Brooklyn, NY 11204(718) 236-2323WebsiteView TestimonialsDirectionsVideoMore InfoGetz & Braverman P.C.(1)172 E 161st St, Bronx, NY 10451(866) 912-3551Injury? Arrested? Accident? Police Brutality? 24/7WebsiteContact UsDirectionsVideoMore InfoFishlin & Fishlin, PLLC(1)118 N Bedford Rd Suite 100, Mount Kisco, NY 10549(212) 736-8000WebsiteContact UsDirectionsMore InfoCommunity Legal SolutionsServing the New York area.(888) 280-0993We can help! Contact us today.WebsiteContact UsMore Info24/7 LegalServing the New York area.(888) 659-7710WebsiteContact UsMore InfoLegalFoxServing the New York area.(888) 981-8587Find a Local AttorneyWebsiteMore Info24/7 Legal(3)Serving the New York area.(888) 659-7710Need A Lawyer?  Call 24/7 Legal.  Get Help Now.WebsiteContact UsMore InfoTVC Pro DriverServing the New York area.(877) 623-3533WebsiteMore InfoLegal Aid Legal Services Corp.Serving the New York area.(888) 877-7150WebsiteMore InfoA TRAFFIC TICKET ATTORNEYS CALIFORNIA & NATIONWIDE(36)Serving the New York area.(877) 787-2334Commercial - Taxi - DUI - Or ANY Driver, California & NationwideWebsiteMore InfoDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glassHelpful Reviews Abramson Joel Erosieyposie7 ratedAveryEXCEPTIONALnycHOTEL-LOCAL6 UNION ATTORNEY, ALL LAW CASES,our FORECLOSER closing attorney*THIS NYC HOTEL UNION PENSIONER/MEMBER OF LOCAL 153-has the wonderful experience of with the help of our NYC HOTEL TRADES COUNCIL UNION @local 6 in NYC -is lucky enough to have JOEL ABRAMSON as the FREEMANS counci REAL ESTATE FORECLOSER/CLOSING ATTORNEY at such hard times going to COURT CONFERENCE FORECLOSER CASE PRESENTLY*  and had used him prior to my senior moms residential HOUSE CLOSING UPSTATE NY 5 YEARS AGO.TODAY, it seems that OUR BANK LENDER- my MOMS & my BROTHERSPROPERTY IS IN A LIMBO STAGE WITH NEARLY EVERY MONTH THAT GOESBY----WE MUST APPEAR AT THE JAMAICA COURTS- AT COURT CONFERENCE FORECLOSER CASE TOJUDGE FLUGS COURTROOM 43 TO DEFEND MY MOMS & BROTHERS PROPERTYFROM GOING INTO FORECLOSER*MOM IS TODAY 85 YEARS OLDAND MY BROTHER IS ON SSDOUR BANK LENDER ORIGINALLY APPROVED DOING A HOUSE BANK MORTGAGE OVER THEIR BUDGET OF$ 2972.56 MONTHLY WHEN ALL ALONGTHE BANK KNEW THAT THEIR BOTHINCOMES OF GOVERNEMENT INCOMETOTALED MONTHLY OF $ 1750.00AT CLOSING ON 12/2/2004FOR A NEW CONSTRUCTION 2004 HOUSEIN THE HOWARD BEACH AREA OF HAMILTON BEACH NYIT WAS PARTLY THE FAULT OF THE BANK APPROVING SUCH A HIGH MORTGAGE TO BEGIN WITH AND THE OTHER HALF THE FAULT OF OUR BUILDERTHAT MADE A BREACH OF WARRANTY CONTRACT REFUSING TO MAKE ANY HOUSE REPAIRS, FROM OUR FLOOD HOUSE INS CLAIMS 10/2005 THRU JAN 24, 2006 WHEN THE 106 POLICE & HB FIRE DEPT FOUNDED OVER 100 COUNTS OF DEADLY CARBON MONIXODE IN THE UNFINSHED BASEMENT AT THAT TIME.WE HAD TO TRY & LIVE IN A HOUSE THAT WAS SAFE, AND AT THAT TIME,2006 WE DID NOT HAVE THE HELP OFOUR HOUSE BUILDER UNDER WARRANTYTO DO SO- AND WE JUST FOUND OUT RECENTLY ABOUT A LAW THAT PROTECTS NEW CONSTRUCTION HOMEOWNERS IN NYS FROM EXLUDING THEM TO MAKE ANY MORTGAGE HOUSE PAYMENTS DUE TO THE FACT THE HOUSE WAS NOT LIVEABLE CALLED:  WARRANTY OF HABITABILITY LAW.WE HOPE THAT THE FREEMANS FREEDOM OF SPEECH WILL TELL THE WHOLE TRUE CASE OF MOMS-WE LOVE OUR HOUSE AND WANT TO NOT DEFAULT BUT TO BE GIVEN A FAIR HEARING TO TRY AND NEGOTIATE OUR FAMILYS COUNTRYWIDE BANK MORTGAGE LOAN AT A REASONABLE PAYABLE MONTHLY RATE!hope is all we have,thanks JOEL ABRAMSON & JUDGE FLUG OF JAMAICA COURTS,THE FREEMANScc online rated sites:C21 AMIABLE , HOWARD BEACHCOLDWELL BANKER, FRESH MEADOWSREMAX LIBERTY, OZONE PARKHB CHEVY, FOREST HILLSCOUNTRYWIDE, NYC PARK AVE SOCOUNTRYWIDE, CAWeinman J BruceJenieel T. ratedI am eternally grateful to Mr. Weinman!!! He helped my whole family get together. He was a true blessing for us through the whole extensive immigration process. He is extremely knowledgeable, unbelievably patient and tactful with people and he has an amazing personality. Mr. Weinman deserves not all the 6 rating stars but 7 and I will be very specific with you, as I have been in the position of a person who reads tons of reviews looking for a good lawyer. Lets start with the fact that before hiring Mr. Weinman I personally met with about 15 lawyers, some of them even recommended by friends. The problem was that I wasnt happy with any of them. I worked for 18 years as a Human resource specialist and I have the training to recognize the people that can get the job done. Frankly spoken, some of the lawyers I met at that time were very convincing but I was also very well-prepared for my appointments with them and at the end they didnt seem to me either very competent or honest enough or something else was missing. Then, I was browsing online, reading different reviews and I found Mr. Weinman. There were several nice reviews and I decided to try with an initial appointment. Yet when you open the door you see that his office is organized in a manner that is only possible for someone confident, knowledgeable and honest. The next pleasant surprise was that he doesnt make you wait and he doesnt need to, as he gains immediately the clients respect with his positive and honest approach and his extensive knowledge. We discussed L1 visa, H1 visa, E1 and E2 and I decided to hire him right on the spot. 18 months later, I am so happy with my decision because he helped my mother, then my father and then my best friend. 3 out of 3 absolutely successful cases. Two of them I know were extremely difficult. Thank you, Mr. Weinman, you are a true blessing for me and my family! And for those of you who took the time to read my review, I wish you just a little good luck because I know now that you will be in the hands of a great lawyer.Law Office of Ganesh N. Viswanathan, EsqMaria R. ratedI am a woman from the Caribbean Island and even though I have been living here for a number of years, I have had very little interaction with the court systems and litigation. A person who is from the same Islands, married me a decade and half ago, and we have a child. After many years into the marriage, I was not even aware he went ahead and filed for divorce. Over the years, he has accumulated a lot of savings in pension plans and retirement funds and he is quite smart in understanding how the legal systems work. I was not aware of any of his assets; one day, he filed for a divorce and then pretended as if nothing happened. He never served on me directly, but, was devising a way to fool me by not serving but going ahead and obtaining a default order, with no disclosure and no distribution to me. I was naive but something in my mind was telling me something was not alright, because, my neighbors told me somebody like a process server came to my home in my absence. I went and checked the Court and to my horror I found out my husband filed a divorce action against me more than a year ago; this is the time, when I somehow came into contact Mr. Viswanathan's Office and his Office did a brilliant job in bringing into light everything that happened right on my back and explained everything to me. My Law Office immediately moved the Court and in detail put forth in the papers before the Court everything that happened. Now, my case proceeding very well far beyond my expectations. I shall be entitled to a share in his assets; further, I am going to be entitled to a good spousal support and a child support. I did not even imagine that I would be entitled to a penny from my husband. All because of the great investigative legal work carried out by Mr. Viswanathan and his excellent team. I am now so happy because of their great work. My husband whom I meet every week, is sulking and the nature of his talk completely changed - for the betterThe Law Office of Lance Fletcherkurt-22nyc ratedStop looking around the Internet and just read.  I just got a new job and my coworkers took me out for a celebration. We went out for drinks and to make matters worse, I started drinking shots.  Big mistake because I had several. (I'm done with shots from this point on)  I got into a fight - apparently - I don't remember the details but I woke up in a cell with cuts and bruises. I got charged with assault for hitting a guy and pushing him to the ground and resisting arrest and I thought my life was over because you can't get a good job with a record. I was scared, frustrated, confused, and I started looking around for a good lawyer to take my case. I came across Lance Fletcher's website and it looked pretty good.  You never know if that means it's gonna be a good lawyer so I called him for a consultation.  When I went to see him, I was a nervous reck and couldn't sleep.  I didn't want to lose my job or go to jail.  During the consultation, we discussed similar cases he's had like mine.  Turns out he's a former prosecutor and he really knew what he was talkin about. After I saw him, I had the best nights sleep since the arrest. He looked me in the eye and explained how he was going to keep my record clean and fight the case.  Most of the lawyers I spoke to just wanted money right away but Mr. fletcher was more interested in me and the case.  He took the time to meet and discuss the details. On the first court date, he filed a motion to dismiss. He got a copy of the medical records, saw that the other guy wasn't really hurt, and got the DA to drop the criminal charges.  I had to do a brief anger class but I avoided jail and no criminal record. I got to keep my job and I can't thank him enough. One thing - I wish I saw him sooner because my family tried to set me up with a lawyer but that guy didn't know what he was talking about and had me pretty scared.  Turk, Hugh M, JD1984perry ratedThere was little to no response (not even taking two minutes to send a follow-up email or telephone call) to my many inquiries for help with my case from one of the lawyers and his secretary of this firm. The wheels of justice may move at a very slow pace yet apparently something else was going on here; undoubtedly, they are preoccupied with larger concerns. However, if certain people within this office are unable, unwilling or uninterested in assisting the one who is inexperienced in legal matters (perhaps with unrealistic expectations, yet unfortunately forced into a legal circumstance though small in scope), then simply say so. But please do not ignore an individual for months--especially after promising to help. Initially, you had given hope to this expunged "criminal" and after he pleaded again and again for assistance some action was finally taken. Now, it appears it is all over. The abusive, unchecked and condescending authorities have won. The incurring frustration, seemingly endless wait, as well as the expensive fees were paid by this innocent victim. And despite the adversities and disappointments he will go on, wishing well of authorities, legal professionals and, most of all, hoping to be safeguarded from both professions since he is simply a law-abiding citizen, who probably needs to forget the injustice committed against him, and only wants to make his way in this world. With malice toward none, may there be mutual respect, honesty and compassion among all peoples and our various ways of life.Law Offices of Lauren Goldberg, PLLCEli B. ratedI had lost all hope that I would get through my horrible 5 year of back pay situation at Work, religion discrimination and long harassment; after other lawyers had turned me down and said I had no Case!    From the initial meeting, Lauren Goldberg were responsive to my calls, questions and concerns. All issues were handled professionally and in timely manner.Lauren Goldberg is a team of lawyers in one Brilliant person; she is an outstanding lawyer and person!Lauren is a sharp strategist and truly cares for her many clients. She provided both me, and my wife excellent support and quality service,Lauren was also very responsive via e mail and phone whenever I had questions and compassionate when I was stressed and upset.I always felt that my needs were met and that the firm was invested in my case and me.Lauren was easily accessible, got back to me quickly, worked with me to understand me,although English is my Second language, Lauren understood me and asked many question.Lauren Goldberg Billing rates are VERY fair! Ensuring that my legal costs were efficiently managed for me throughout the process,including explanation of taxes needed to be paid from my Back-pay settlement. Lauren had helped me with the financial expense beyond my expectation; I would recommend Lauren Goldberg for your case! Lauren was aggressive to our adversaries and got me the results that I wanted.Lauren is concise and very powerful with her words leaving no stone unturned!(And I was Happy to pay my Taxes!)Timothy S. Hart, Tax Attorney and CPASarah V. ratedI came to Tim with a huge tax bill resulting from a foreclosure a few years prior. I procrastinated handling the issue and felt like there was zero hope for me to resolve. At the request of my family, I sought legal counsel. Not knowing where to turn to find a lawyer (it was the first time I had even sought such help), I researched the best tax lawyers online via YELP and other sites. Tim’s reviews were all very positive and some of them reminded me of my problem so I thought maybe he can help me too.I was nervous speaking to him for the first time. Completely intimidated and ashamed. He was totally professional, kind and passed no judgement. He only wanted to help me figure out a solution. He was easy to speak to and any confusing legalese was quickly explained so I could understand.As it turned out in the end, and after Tim’s deep dive into my returns and the tax law, he discovered that my accountant had made an error and the payment was not necessary. I owed nothing. Had I not sought Tim’s help, I can assure you that I would be sitting here still feeling the heavy weight of the IRS looming over me. He truly saved me. If you are desperate, afraid, confused by the IRS and/or owe them money and  feel you have nowhere to turn, you must contact Tim Hart. You will not regret it. Don’t be afraid to make the first contact.Law Office of Paul R. Kenneymissdiatribe ratedAfter over a year of negotiating a real estate agreement, frustrations mounted and I needed to hire an attorney. Around the busy 4th of July season, I reached out to a few referrals from friends and neither of those attorneys got back to me. However, through some online research, I came across great reviews of the Law Offices of Paul Kenney, which is conveniently located on the Upper West Side, in a more serene location than the insanity of Midtown and Wall St. Paul responded to my inquiry right away and was wonderful with follow-up from there on out. His fees were incredibly reasonable and I had no idea how much easier the process would be with him facilitating. Our first meeting took away all the mounting anxiety I had accumulated and the entire process became painless and stress-free. Paul managed to get all that I wanted put into the contract and approved. He has a unique talent for finding the right approach in handling the eccentric and sometimes difficult characters that saturate the real estate market in NYC.  His savvy and pleasant disposition completely disarmed the other party. He made himself available to me for any questions or concerns that popped up and was incredibly diligent in handling all the details.  I would absolutely recommend him to anyone in need of a real estate attorney.Law Office of Paul R. KenneyLara B. ratedI was suddenly thrown into a roommate battle with a friend I had lived with for over a year regarding a sublease and frantically started searching for tenant lawyers. Paul was the very first to get back to me and after hearing my story, he was very straight forward and clear in explaining what my options were. He wasn't intimidating to talk to, and didn't ask for payment before telling me his opinion and advice. This unofficial consultation would have cost over $350 for at the other lawyers I had reached out to. (As quoted in their e-mails!) I told him I'd like to continue working with him until the issue was solved and he became my savior through the whole process. He worked with my roommates lawyer to settle the issues and kept me updated every step of the way. Even when I got nervous and would call him at random times during the day, he took my call and would reassure me that he is on top of the situation and that he would continue to work on any other issues that arose with her. When all the issues were resolved, he stuck to the very reasonable price that he originally quoted me - no surprise fees or over charges. I would recommend him to any and all of my friends and I would go back to him in a heartbeat. I feel very lucky to have found him.  The Law Office of Lance Fletcherscottm75 ratedI hired this lawyer for a Felony A very unfortunate thing happened over the holidays.  While I was on probation for DWI, I got arrested again for the same thing. I was SO SCARED I couldn't sleep at night. The judge let me out on bail and I found the Law Office of Lance Fletcher online. when I called I was able to speak with Mr. Fletcher right away.  He was smart and honest and a good guy. From the moment I first met him, his passion and confidence really impressed me. During the case, he kept in touch about things the DA was trying to do to me, it looked like I was going to jail for a while buy Mr Fletcher said we had to keep fighting and giving them motions and push for better. It was all good in the end because I got off with only a fine some classes and no driving for a while. I even avoided a felony record. I still can't believe I stayed out of jail!!!! Every other lawyer I talked to before hiring Mr. Fletcher told me I was going to jail.  Now Every day I go outside and see the sun I know I made a good decision to hire this lawyer. Did You Know?Types of AttorneysThe legal profession is vast, with each attorney having his or her specialties. Here are some of the most common attorneys individuals seek out when they require legal aid:Criminal Lawyer
A criminal defense lawyer is probably the attorney the average person imagines. Criminal attorneys are the men and women who defend individuals accused of a crime. The lawyer may work pro bono - for the public good - so the accused is certain to have representation, even if he or she cannot afford an attorney.Criminal lawyers are experts in the criminal justice system. They help their clients decide how to plead when first charged by the police and guide them through trial procedures. Defense lawyers must use every bit of their knowledge and resources to get their clients the fairest results from criminal proceedings.Business Lawyer
If you are a small business owner or the head of a larger corporation, you may come into contact with a business lawyer. Many big companies keep a legal staff on payroll to deal with the daily operations of running and maintaining a large enterprise. Business lawyers may have more specific specialties like copyright law, product liability and mergers and acquisitions.Business attorneys may focus their practices on certain industries. There are entertainment lawyers to guide artists through royalties and media contracts, while hospitals employ malpractice attorneys to protect doctors from aggressive litigation.Employment Lawyer
When you work for a company, you may find yourself in need of an employment lawyer - especially if the relationship between you and your employer sours. An employment attorney prevents people from losing their jobs due to unfair reasons. Workers' compensation lawyers help maintain safe employment conditions and ensure workers receive fair compensation after workplace injury or discrimination.Finance Lawyer
A personal finance attorney can protect and manage your investments and securities. You may use a finance lawyer to help you prepare your taxes, but you might be better off working with an accountant. A tax attorney is more commonly contacted after a business or individual runs into trouble with the IRS or state regulators.Real Estate Lawyer
Your family may keep a lawyer on retainer to guide you through the major expenses that come up in life. When buying a home, you could work with a real estate lawyer to make sure you get the best deal and won't get taken advantage of by tricky mortgage agreements or unfair landlords. An estate attorney can help you plan for the worst by creating a will and preparing your finances for after your death.Bankruptcy Lawyer
A bankruptcy lawyer is essential to help you resolve your financial difficulties when they start to spin out of control. Certain attorneys help create strategies to bring you out of debt and speak to your creditors. A lawyer can advise you on which type of bankruptcy you should file for.Civil Lawyer
If you are suing someone or being sued, you need a civil lawyer. Civil attorneys - and criminal lawyers - are the legal representatives who argue on your behalf in a courtroom setting. Civil lawyers may represent you on matters of business, finance or a wide variety of other specialized needs.One of the most common types of civil attorneys is a personal injury lawyer. When you're hurt by an outside party and you would like to hold them legally responsible, a personal injury attorney conducts litigation and negotiates settlements to compensate for your pain and suffering. Sometimes many wronged people will join together with a single civil lawyer or law office to form a class action lawsuit.Family/Divorce Lawyer
Most people will turn to a lawyer during a divorce to navigate the emotionally charged legal proceedings. A divorce attorney can assist in determining grounds for separation, division of property and custody of children.Family attorneys deal with much more personal matters. If you're getting married, a family lawyer can help you prepare a prenuptial agreement or other family planning paperwork such as adoption or inheritance documents.Questions One Should Ask a Lawyer Before Hiring ThemTo ensure you find a competent attorney who won't abuse your trust or drain your finances, you have to make the proper inquiries. There are several questions you should ask, but the majority will fall under three general topics:Training and Experience Questions
One of the best ways to determine quality is to examine an attorney's history. When you first step into a lawyer's office, you should check for the appropriate certifications and diplomas. You have to ask how long he or she has practiced law and request information that demonstrates the practice's success. Look for precise details such as percentage of cases settled out of court.Once you inquire about the broad details of their legal career, you should ask questions about their experience that pertains to your specific issue. You should ask how many similar cases they have handled and if they have special skills or training that applies specifically to your needs. Lawyers can't mention clients by name, but you should ask for basic details about identical past cases.Financial Questions
You need to ask about every possible fee that will come up when working with an attorney. You should request a list of all costs in advance so you won't be surprised by additional expenses like overhead. Also determine exactly when you will start being billed. You want to inspect paperwork carefully. If the attorney charges you for his or her experience, you need to make sure he or she will perform tasks personally and not hand it off to an assistant.Find out if the attorney has a flat fee or charges by the hour. Many civil lawyers work on contingency. Whatever the payment plan, make inquiries about how the lawyer plans to provide service for your money and what you can do if you start to feel unsatisfied with his or her performance.Lawyer/Client Relationship Questions
When you hire a lawyer, you're agreeing to work with someone over a certain period of time. You need to ask questions about how the attorney will communicate with you and what responsibilities you hold in the relationship. The attorney should let you know the best channel for quick communication and you need to inform him or her when you want updates.You should also ask questions to get to know the attorney as an individual in order to ensure this is a person you can trust. Ask about their legal philosophy and how he or she views the lawyer/client relationship. Great questions to start off with are ones that will make your life easier, such as how to keep fees down or what daily disruptions you should expect from a long legal battle. The more forthcoming the lawyer appears to be with individual needs, the better.Top Reasons to Hire a LawyerYou may keep a lawyer on retainer or you could turn to an attorney during specific situations. Here are some common reasons people begin seeking legal representation or advice:You Know Your Limitations
If you sign documents and you come across a word you don't recognize, you need assistance. You may need a third party to help you navigate important employment or real estate paperwork. It's essential you fully understand the terms of any legally binding documentation or activity you become a part of. If you are not an expert in a given field, you'll want to hire an attorney who is.A lawyer may find legal implications or opportunities you might miss. If you find yourself in a civil or criminal matter, a proper attorney ensures you don't receive a harsh punishment for a small mistake.You're Facing an Important Event/Decision
When making decisions critical to your financial stability or personal life, you may want a lawyer with expertise in your situation to make sure you do everything you can to arrive at the proper resolution. This is especially true when you become involved in a criminal case and your freedom is on the line.It's not just a matter of legal knowledge; lawyer's have access to numerous resources you do not. They have staff ready to work around the clock and experts in a variety of fields to give your important issues the attention they deserve.You Can't Be Impartial
During times when personal matters intersect with legal proceedings, you may need to have an advocate to prevent your emotions from getting in the way of level-headed thinking. For example, divorce lawyers can mediate a heated argument and help both partners get on with their lives.Emotional investment could be subtle. You may want to have a lawyer look over an investment opportunity that looks too good to be true or investigate the merits of a possible civil suit when you feel wronged.You're Out of Options
Many people turn to lawyers when they are in trouble. If you've been accused of a crime or are in a terrible financial situation, you can find an attorney who will work with what you have available to assist you as you deal with your problems.Personal injury lawyers find solutions for people who can no longer work under their own power and bankruptcy attorneys prevent people from giving in to debt. If you find yourself in a situation where you can't find a solution, a lawyer may be able to offer the counsel you need.How to Choose a LawyerWhen it comes time to choose a lawyer, you should start by searching close to home. While you probably don't want the conflict of interest that comes from being represented by a family member, friends and loved ones can recommend lawyers who served them well in the past. If you do have attorneys you are familiar with, ask who they believe would be best for you.After going through personal references - especially from individuals who had similar needs - you should broaden your search through public information resources. You can call your area's attorney referral service or check legal organizations like Martindale-Hubbell. There are other resources available online. You should check websites for client reviews and other third-party forms of approval.When you build a list of possible candidates, perform a background check on each one. See if you can find information on their history and success record. Once you find a possible lawyer, you should call to arrange a consultation so you can ask your important questions in person.By performing the necessary research and taking every available precaution, you can narrow your search to the attorney most suited to your needs. 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback
• Rappaport Richard V & Associates • New York •                      USA   New York  LoginRegisterLogin with Facebook        R Rappaport Richard V & Associates    Not evaluated yet  Evaluate     112 Madison Ave, New York, New York, 10016-7416    About Us How to get     RAPPAPORT RICHARD V & ASSOCIATES | New York  |  Add to My list Added        Companies  Products      Search companies…  







  Edit Rappaport Richard V & Associates    112 Madison Ave, 10016-7416   New York, New York  How to get    Employment Law       







  Top Businesses         Dedicated Dog Training       Chicago Criminal Defense & Personal Injury Attorney Sal Sheikh       Pittsburgh SEO Magician       Evolution Hearing       Tomeo Sills, LLC   







   Evaluations of Rappaport Richard V & Associates:        To evaluate this company please Login or Register    Statistics:8times viewed0times listed   Keywords: Employment Law, Employment Law New York Rappaport Richard V & Associates - New York    112 Madison Ave, 10016-7416Show on map   How to get   







id0310003082975 Related Content for: Rappaport Richard V & Associates    Stanford : NETA 1016 : 2005613_r06x_00CV4849 Register now to access 7 million high quality study materials (What's Course Hero?) Course Hero is the premier ...      David Kamp.com - Vanity Fair Archives An upbeat story about death. There had already been tons of articles published about Johnny Cash’s unlikely late-in-life artistic alliance with Rick Rubin, which ...      2_20_11 Daily Profile Map - Get Visibility, Drive Revenues - … Generated Business Profile Daily Map. Profiles Generated on 2_20_11: 354990615 GRAYNER ENGINEERING 354991362 KLT 354992412 DAILEY ENGINEERING …      Directory of PHYSICIANS & SURGEONS in CALIFORNIA … IMPORTANT ANNOUNCEMENT (2012.05.27 – California) — REALLY made IN USA™ has perked up its local social media networks to include the most up-to-date ...      Theatres - New York, London, Toronto & International The web's greatest multi-award winning theatre research site on theatres in New York, London, Toronto, and International cities, not only those current, but those ...      99gctall - #2fishygirl on Scribd | Scribd city of new york department of. finance 1998 - stock allocation below 100 percent report name issuers allocation percent 1.33 23.80 92.94 69.80 25.00 0.44 75.45 65.57 ...      How to get solutions manual and tests bank | Publish Thesis ... Get solutions manual and test bank ... The Largest Electronic Library for Master and PhD Theses Publishing, Getting Solution Manual and Test Bank      Directory of PHYSICIANS & SURGEONS in FLORIDA Updated! -- … REALLY made IN USA™ has perked up its consumer media networks to include the newest regional info, proprietorship details, service providers, product makers, and ...      WikiFilms.lst - steve-museum Actrius Ang Lee Apocalypse Now Animaniacs Ally McBeal Auguste and Louis Lumière ALF Tales A Little Night Music Anyone Can Whistle A Funny Thing Happened on the …      comics research bibliography: L - R - Rensselaer Polytechnic ... This bibliography lists both monographs and articles from popular magazines and academic journals pertaining to comic books, comic strips and animation.      Local listings. Business YellowPages at Yellowbook.com What (e.g. pizza, florist, Joe's Pizza) Where (Address, City, State or ZIP)      Full text of "La Salle" - Welcome to the US Petabox See other formats. Full text of "La Salle"      RESTON, Virginia (VA) Political Contributions by Individuals ... FCC Registered Amateur Radio Licenses in city_name, Virginia      Browse Categories in Ottawa, OH Vehicles & Auto Repair. Body Shops, New Car Sales, Windshield Replacement, Rental Cars, Motorcycle Service, Car Audio, Tire Shops. Vehicles » Vehicle Service»      Test Bank&Solution Manual hello everybody especially students, do not worry about exams , quizes ,homeworks..... We have all testbanks, solutionmanuals you need, just Email us : testbank777@ ...      Full text of "73 Magazine (November 1982)" See other formats. Full text of "73 Magazine (November 1982)"      Modern Architecture Journal tag:blogger.com,1999:blog-16950727 2012-03-25T14:15:32.030-07:00 Modern Architecture Journal Scrapbook-Style Digest on Modern Architecture em locke …      Florida Mobile Home & RV Lawyer & Attorney : Scott … Florida ROC : Florida Mobile Home & RV Lawyer & Attorney : Scott Gordon : Lutz Bobo Telfair Eastman Gabel & Lee Law Firm : FL Condo & Homeowners Associations      Lead411 People Directory: Emails, Addresses, Titles Lead411's People profiles including all business people from A to Z.      Attorney - Richard V. Rappaport and Associates Richard V. Rappaport and Associates represents clients throughout New York and Long Island as well as...      Rappaport Richard V & Associates112 Madison Ave10016-7416New YorkNew York     About TuugoToSPrivacy PolicyFAQMobileTranslate TuugoSite MapBlog0.0271070003509523Copyright 2009 - 2017 Tuugo  


    Companies in New York New York USA               Companies in New York New York USA LoginRegisterLogin with Facebook www.tuugo.us    Companies  Products      Hotels, New York    Search in: New York           CompaniesProducts +Publish for free Promote your Ad   Home   New York 














Alabama
(187,129)


Alaska
(69,639)


American Samoa
(20)


Arizona
(106,511)


Arkansas
(99,153)


California
(4,172)


Colorado
(54,956)


Connecticut
(25,391)


D.C.
(402)


Delaware
(7,461)


Federated States Of Micronesia
(26)


Florida
(141,041)


Georgia
(65,937)


Guam
(40)


Hawaii
(11,221)


Idaho
(10,735)


Illinois
(4,887)


Indiana
(30,206)


Iowa
(14,809)


Kansas
(16,893)


Kentucky
(20,091)


Louisiana
(29,009)


Maine
(5,183)


Marshall Islands
(5)


Maryland
(29,349)


Massachusetts
(48,081)


Michigan
(46,188)


Minnesota
(31,857)


Mississippi
(11,581)


Missouri
(35,383)


Montana
(6,711)


Nebraska
(11,773)


Nevada
(24,009)


New Hampshire
(7,337)


New Jersey
(59,339)


New Mexico
(10,948)


New York
(117,604)


North Carolina
(46,520)


North Dakota
(3,418)


Northern Mariana Islands
(7)


Ohio
(62,657)


Oklahoma
(21,816)


Oregon
(24,160)


Palau
(8)


Pennsylvania
(70,884)


Puerto Rico
(86)


Rhode Island
(6,792)


South Carolina
(23,292)


South Dakota
(4,515)


Tennessee
(31,645)


Texas
(165,980)


Utah
(15,676)


Vermont
(3,124)


Virgin Islands
(52)


Virginia
(39,123)


Washington
(67,032)


West Virginia
(4,699)


Wisconsin
(32,688)


Wyoming
(3,350)




   New York 














Albany
(1,143)


Amherst
(341)


Amityville
(146)


Amsterdam
(111)


Auburn
(158)


Baldwin
(187)


Baldwinsville
(90)


Batavia
(162)


Bay Shore
(217)


Bellmore
(110)


Binghamton
(357)


Bohemia
(227)


Brentwood
(101)


Brewster
(116)


Briarcliff Manor
(93)


Bronx
(199)


Bronxville
(105)


Brooklyn
(11,084)


Buffalo
(4,133)


Canandaigua
(170)


Cedarhurst
(93)


Centereach
(96)


Cheektowaga
(221)


Cicero
(91)


Clifton Park
(168)


Commack
(168)


Cortland
(102)


Deer Park
(233)


Depew
(178)


East Amherst
(124)


East Aurora
(107)


East Hampton
(114)


East Meadow
(160)


East Northport
(136)


East Syracuse
(177)


Elmhurst
(272)


Elmira
(156)


Elmont
(129)


Elmsford
(130)


Endicott
(138)


Fairport
(157)


Farmingdale
(344)


Fishkill
(116)


Floral Park
(174)


Franklin Square
(123)


Freeport
(349)


Garden City
(375)


Geneva
(543)


Glen Cove
(166)


Glens Falls
(103)


Gloversville
(101)


Goshen
(138)


Great Neck
(444)


Hamburg
(199)


Hauppauge
(220)


Hempstead
(245)


Hicksville
(339)


Holbrook
(145)


Huntington
(237)


Huntington Station
(224)


Ithaca
(303)


Jamestown
(206)


Jericho
(112)


Kingston
(245)


Larchmont
(107)


Latham
(174)


Levittown
(151)


Lindenhurst
(128)


Liverpool
(241)


Lockport
(213)


Long Island
(758)


Lynbrook
(183)


Mahopac
(97)


Mamaroneck
(139)


Manhasset
(117)


Massapequa
(206)


Medford
(206)


Melville
(185)


Merrick
(124)


Middletown
(414)


Mineola
(241)


Monroe
(176)


Monsey
(92)


Mount Kisco
(163)


Mount Vernon
(368)


Nanuet
(145)


New City
(218)


New Hyde Park
(267)


New Rochelle
(390)


New Windsor
(114)


New York
(30,887)


New York City
(9,293)


Newburgh
(283)


Niagara Falls
(336)


North Hills
(402)


North Syracuse
(162)


North Tonawanda
(148)


Nyack
(104)


Oceanside
(166)


Oneonta
(159)


Orchard Park
(161)


Ossining
(120)


Oswego
(117)


Patchogue
(171)


Peekskill
(99)


Pittsford
(159)


Plainview
(229)


Plattsburgh
(130)


Port Chester
(171)


Port Washington
(162)


Poughkeepsie
(495)


Queens
(3,831)


Queensbury
(125)


Riverhead
(128)


Rochester
(4,241)


Rockville Centre
(200)


Rome
(92)


Ronkonkoma
(205)


Saratoga Springs
(195)


Scarsdale
(190)


Schenectady
(414)


Smithtown
(235)


Spring Valley
(194)


Staten Island
(1,863)


Suffern
(102)


Syosset
(166)


Syracuse
(2,951)


Tarrytown
(112)


Tonawanda
(238)


Troy
(142)


Uniondale
(93)


Utica
(278)


Valley Stream
(324)


Vestal
(114)


Victor
(107)


Wantagh
(111)


Wappingers Falls
(144)


Warwick
(123)


Watertown
(105)


Webster
(163)


West Babylon
(176)


West Hempstead
(141)


West Islip
(94)


West Seneca
(213)


Westbury
(285)


White Plains
(688)


Williamsville
(288)


Woodbury
(92)


Yonkers
(764)


Yorktown Heights
(106)




     Sort byBest RatedMost recentDistance Filtered By State: New Yorkx Town: New Yorkx    By Categories   Agriculture, Fishing & Forestry   Farming equipment and services Feed, seed and grain Fishing General supplies and services Soil  Apparel & Accessories   Accesories Alterations and services businesses Clothing Footwear Outwear Uniforms  Art, Entertainment & Media   Agents, agencies and organizations Amusement centres  Artists and entertainers Arts Auditoriums and Halls Casinos and gambling Games, Hobbies and Parties Music News and information Night life Radio Theatre Tickets and seats Video, movies and television  Automotive   Accessories Detailing and aesthetics  Motorcycles Motorized vehicles  New and used car dealers Parts and supplies Related services Repairs Roadside assistance  Construction & Renovation   Building materials & Equipment Ceramic and Tiles Chimneys Concrete, Cement & Paving Contractor Equipment & Services Design and Architecture Electrical Products and Services Floors, Ceilings & Roofs Hardware Supplies & Services Inspectors & Surveyors Painting & Plastering Plumbing & Piping  Education   Academic centers Service and Supplies Specialized Schools  Family & Community   Children and Child care Community Services & Organizations Business Pet Services Pet Supplies  Finance & Legal   Accounting Services Bank and Financial Services Financial Industry Supplies Insurance Investment services Legal Loans and Credit services business Money services Retirement and Financial planning Taxes  Food & Beverages   Bars, Pubs & Cafes Beverages Desserts & Sweets Facilities and Services Foods General Restaurants  Health & Medicine   Alternative Health Care Associations & Organizations Dental Care Diet and Nutrition Doctors and Health Specialists Fitness and Exercise Health services Hospital & Clinics Long term Care Medical Products Equipment Physicians and Surgeons Therapy & Counselling Vision & Eye Care  Home & Garden   Accessories Appliances Cabinets, Racks & Organizers Cleaning Supplies & Services Cooling & Ventilating Doors Furniture Garden & Lawn Heating business Housewares Housing Providers Interior decoration Kitchen & Bath Supplies Lighting Moving and Storage Outdoor accessories and equipment Outdoor services Painting, Floor & Wall coverings Pest control Safety & Security  Industrial Supplies & Services   Adhesives, Chemicals, Inks, Dyes & Lubricants Amusement equipment and devices Canvas and traps Cleaning Equipment, Supply & Services Engraving, Embossing, Planting & Lamination Furniture General supplies and services Glass, Seals & Sealants Heating, cooling, ventilation and air conditioning Hydraulics and pneumatics Industrial Electrical Supplies & Services Industrial food and beverage  Instruments – General Labels and labeling Locksmiths, locks and keys Machines, Machining Machinery Material handling Metals, metals working and metals products Oil, coal, fuels and natural gases Plastics and rubber products and services Printing publishing Security and safety products Specialty equipment and supplies Textiles Tools Warehouses business Water Wood and paper  Personal Care   Barbers, Beauty salons & Spas Body art & Piercing Cosmetics Skin and Scalp Services & Products Supplies  Public utilities & Environment   Energy and power Environment Mining Public security Public utilities Waste  Real Estate & Insurance   Building management Insurance Business Real Estate  Shopping & Speciality Stores   Antiques Apparel & accessories Art supplies and services Books Boutiques Cigar, Cigarette & Tobacco Consignment Shops Department Stores Discount, used and rental goods Games and toys Gifts and novelty  Party supplies and services Religious Goods Science Supplies Shopping services and supplies Smoke Shops Smokers' Article Manufacturers & Wholesalers Tobacco Growers & Wholesalers  Sports & Recreation   Associations and clubs Bicycles Boat and watersport Camping Games Golf Hunting and guns Individual sports Parks and recreation centres Racquet Sports Sport services Sporting goods Stadiums and sporting facilities Team sports  Technology   Communication Services & Equipment Computer Equipment Computer Services Electronic Services & Equipment Information systems Internet  Transportation   Aircrafts and airports Boats and marine Buses Mass and public transportation Special Transportation Services Trucking and freight  Travel & Lodging   Lodging Tours and excursions Transport Travel agencies    

      Featured Ad.How to feature my Ad?        Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      Bruce Yerman, Attorney at Law     160 Broadway, 4th Fl. | 10038     See phone loading...  646-613-0290      See mobile loading... 646-360-0290      See fax loading... 646-349-1284     Contact         Criminal Law, DUI/DWI Law, Domestic Violence Law, Drug Crimes Law, Family Law       Featured Ad.How to feature my Ad?        Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      NY NJ MOVERS     171 Madison Ave, new jersey | 10016     See phone loading...  201-464-2024             Contact         movers nyc, Flat Rate Movers, Movers, Moving Companies, Moving Services, Moving services NYC, NYC Movers, best movers nyc       Featured Ad.How to feature my Ad?        Not evaluated yet  Add to My list Added      GPD Host     375 Pearl St 6th floor | 10038     See phone loading...  +1 718 975 7576             Contact         Best Web Hosting for Wordpress, Cheap Wordpress Hosting, Wordpress Web Hosting, Best Hosting for Wordpress, buy cpanel web hosting, Web Hosting Company, buy shared hosting, Web Hosting  
   N     Based on 5 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Northgate Barber Shop     1159 Jericho Tpke Commack, NY 11725 | 11725     See phone loading...  631-543-9869             Contact         Barbershop      B     Based on 5 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Bon-Bon Hair Salon And Spa     571 3rd Ave | 10016     See phone loading...  212.286.2266             Contact         bon-bon salon and spa           Based on 5 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Le Reve Hair Salon     1456 2nd Ave, New York, NY 10075 | 10075     See phone loading...  (212) 879-9867             Contact         Hairsalon, beauty, Hair, Style           Based on 5 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      1daywall     275 7th Avenue, 18th Floor, NY | 10001     See phone loading...  212-470-4868      See mobile loading... 212-470-4868         Contact         Temporary Walls           Based on 5 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      First US Funding     36-36 33rd Street #306 | 11106     See phone loading...  866-363-6766             Contact         merchant cash advance           Based on 5 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Fifth Ave Barber Shop     1 West 35 Street | 10018     See phone loading...  212-837-1250             Contact         barber, Barbers, Barbershop, Haircut           Based on 4 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      The Vintage Optical Shop     NY     Contact         retro round eyeglasses, vintage eyeglass frames men, vintage style eyeglass frames, vintage eyewear online, vintage glasses frames           Based on 4 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Art Of Dermatology     317 E 34th St | 10016     See phone loading...  212-488-5599             Contact         sclerotherapy nyc, vein removal nyc, botox new york city           Based on 4 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      City IT Service     139 W 35th Street, Suite 801,       See phone loading...  3474807910             Contact         computer repair nyc, Laptop Repair, it services nyc, computer repair new york           Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Carpet Cleaning NYC     829 Park Ave | 10021      See mobile loading... (917) 831-4478             Contact         carpet cleaning nyc, rug cleaning nyc, Drape Shade Cleaning nyc, nyc carpet cleaners, Upholstery Cleaning Services      L     Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Little Tony & Igor Be good     103 West 11th St New York, NY 10011 | 10011     See phone loading...  (212) 242-8028             Contact         barber           Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Marty Security Locks     1410 Broadway #928 | 10018     See phone loading...  646-4459-4358             Contact         New York locksmith, New York locksmiths, locksmith in new york, Locksmith Nyc, Car Lock Re-Keying, Locksmithing, new york, NYC           Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Joongkoogjip Chinese restaurant     203-16 Northern Blvd. NY 11361 | 11361     See phone loading...  718-428-2221             Contact         Chinese Restaurant      V     Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Victoria Benatar, ARCHITECT PLLC     220 East 57th St. #2K | 10022     See phone loading...  +1 212-755-0525             Contact         Architecture NYC, Interior Designer NYC, Commercial Architect NYC, Architecture Firm NYC, Hospitality Architecture NYC, Residential Architect NYC           Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      GOSO Direct     3450 11th Street, Astoria       See phone loading...  +1 800-269-0704      See fax loading... 718-233-2686         Contact  See products         Electronics Computers, Home Office, Health & Personal Care, Automotive & Industrial      P     Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Posh Home     Soho, New York, NY | 10012   Contact         Business Services           Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Blinds Store NYC | Royal Window Treatments     180 Lexington Ave, NY | 10016     See phone loading...  +1 212-473-1111             Contact         Window Treatment           Based on 3 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      NYC Signature Limo     347 5th Avenue, Suite #1402 | 10016     See phone loading...  212-577-1171      See fax loading... 212-937-3991         Contact  See products         airport taxi NY, limo New York, limo service NYC, stretch limo New York, stretch limousine NYC, corporate limo NY, corporate limousine New York, airport limo service NYC           Based on 2 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      ChannelSale     ChannelSale Software Services, 511 Sixth Avenue, #24 | 10011     See phone loading...  866-709-9495             Contact         affiliate data feed, google product feed, product feed, marketplace integration, Marketing, Ecommerce           Based on 2 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Maid Marines Cleaning Service     37 W 26th St #410 | 10010     See phone loading...  212-390-1629             Contact         Cleaning Services New York, Maid Services NYC, House Cleaning Manhattan, Cleaning Companies New York, New York Home Cleaning, Housekeeping Services, Maids NYC, Cleaning Services           Based on 2 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Expense On Demand Limited     410 Park Avenue | 10022     See phone loading...  07968761445             Contact         Expense Management Software, Expense Management System, Expense Report Software, Expense Tracking Software, Expenses Management App           Based on 2 Evaluations  Add to My list Added      Simple Fast Mortgage     244 5th Ave S203 | 10001     See phone loading...  (212) 461-4406             Contact         Home Mortgage Loans, Mortgage Lender, Mortgage Broker, Home Financing Solutions  
  12345678910 Next       Companies  Products      Hotels, New York    Search in: New York        About TuugoToSPrivacy PolicyFAQMobileTranslate TuugoSite MapBlogTuugo Language:  AfrikaansBahasa IndonesiaBahasa MelayuDanskDeutschEnglishEspañolFrançaisItalianoMagyarNederlandsPolskiPortuguêsRomânăSvenskaTiếng ViệtČeštinaΕλληνικάРусскийУкраїнськаภาษาไทย中文 (简写)日本語한국말 0.589598178863534 Copyright 2009 - 2017 Tuugo 
    




















Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney - Salt Lake City, Utah




























	        Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney
		







USA






What are you looking for?
Where is it?








Search


Financial services, pizza delivery...
New York City, San Francisco...











Search companies
pictures
Add your business
Users Access




Trivok
Companies
Utah
Salt Lake City
Rappaport, Richard a. Attorney - Salt Lake City, Utah






Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney - Salt Lake City, Utah

257 East 200 SOUTH, #700 UT 84111 Salt Lake City (Utah)





Tweet











Overview
How to get
Contact
Opinions









Contact with Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney company
Do you need more info about this company? Contact now


Ranking Rappaport, Richard a. ...

245.469Trivok Rank
56.333Legal services & Attorneys



Rappaport, Richard a. ... popularity

Online popularity: 12 / 100
Persons who visited this: 71.877



Categories

Insurance Law Advocates
Lawyers - Defender attorneys
Real Estate Advocates
Trial Attorneys



 Are you the owner?
Improve your ranking and visibility in Trivok completing all the required information of your company.
Edit company data
Add the first company picture


Security Center
Report abuse


 I like this company
Print this page
Tell a friend
Be a fan
Share Business Card
Add this page to 'Favourites'


 You might also like...

Insurance Law Advocates in Utah (45)
Lawyers - Defender attorneys in Utah (56)
Real Estate Advocates in Utah (58)
Trial Attorneys in Utah (90)






Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney information

Purchase the best Attorneys products from Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney at Salt Lake City, UT.


(801) 355-1813


www.crslaw.com			    			    



				Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney: Attorneys best firm in Salt Lake City, UT.			








Do you know how to arrive here?







By clicking Street View you could virtually walk around nearby places and interesting zones close to Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney.









				    This company on your GPS: Latitude: 40.7653070000 Longitude: -111.8835530000
Distance from Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney to Salt Lake City center is 810 yards




5.18 miles from S Salt Lake, UT
Estimated time of arrival by car: 8 minutes


9.46 miles from N Salt Lake, UT
Estimated time of arrival by car: 14 minutes


11.82 miles from Holladay, UT
Estimated time of arrival by car: 18 minutes


12.85 miles from W Valley City, UT
Estimated time of arrival by car: 19 minutes






Trivok Level
(290 points)










Rate Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney services, quality and price using Trivok Level



Share your opinion with Trivok Community on Facebook










			Fill in this application form to contact with Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney :
		




1.- Contact information


* Name / Company
* Email 






Phone / Mobile
Province





- Select a province -
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
Washington, DC
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming




2.- Query details


* Query reason



 Information & Inquiries  Request For Quotation  Make an appointment / Book  Exchange between businesses  


* Subject





* Message

















 I have read and accept the  Terms of Use  and the  Privacy Policy..



Send e-mail










From






For example: Central Park - New York City



Until
				257 East 200 SOUTH, #700
				UT 84111 Salt Lake City (Utah)




Select your State and find out how to get to Rappaport, Richard A. Attorney :

Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
Washington, DC
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming

















Search companies
Add your business
Users Access






info@trivok.com | © 2012 Trivok.com



Business Services

Add your business 
Users Access
Contact



About Trivok

Legal notice
Privacy policy
Terms of use











 



Richard Rappaport


















HOME
BIOGRAPHY
CONTACT ME























As the proud
founder of WestPark capital
Contact Me















Richard Rappaport Chief Executive Officer and Founder


Check the background of investment professionals associated with this site on FINRA’s BrokerCheck






Phone Number (310) 843 9300












Richard Rappaport 
 Richard Rappaport founded WestPark Capital in Los Angeles, California, in 1999.
Prior to establishing WestPark Capital, Mr. Rappaport had over 25 years of extensive experience in the small capital investment banking and securities markets. Throughout his substantial career, Mr.Rappaport has completed the financing of hundreds of companies – both in the United States and internationally.
Read more 

Previous to launching WestPark Capital, Mr. Rappaport was the Managing Director of Investment Banking at internationally based Global Capital Securities, and was Managing Director of Investment Banking at Joseph Charles & Associates from 1995 to 1999.  During his time at both firms, Mr. Rappaport led the investment banking departments and was chiefly responsible for all aspects of corporate financial activities.
From 1987 to 1995, Mr. Rappaport held the Managing Directorship at a Beverly Hills-based boutique Investment Bank.  Here he was responsible for all aspects of the firm’s public offerings, including new business development.  Additionally during this period, Mr. Rappaport completed over 25 public offerings and numerous private transactions.
Mr. Rappaport holds a B.S. in Business Administration from the University of California at Berkeley, and an M.B.A. from the University of California at Los Angeles.  At UCLA, Mr. Rappaport received the Wittenberg-Livingston Fellowship and became a member of the revered Beta Gamma Sigma Business Honorary Society.


Show less











lATEST tweets

Tweets by @RickRappaportWP



Get in Touch



First Name



Last Name






Email Address



Phone No.





Comments

















PRIVACY POLICY
CONDITIONS OF USE
BEST EXECUTION REPORTS
AML
ITPP
BUSINESS CONTINUITY PLAN SUMMARY
WESTPARK CAPITAL LEGAL DISCLAIMER
MEMEBER FINRA/SIPC



© Richard Rappaport. All Rights Reserved















X




Your Email: 
Message : 












